










 







True Partner Volatility U.S. Fund, LP - Pooled Investment Fund- Heijboer  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









True Partner Volatility U.S. Fund, LP

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    C/O True Partner Volatility Gp, Llc 111 West Jackson Blvd., Suite 1700 
    Chicago, IL, 60604Phone: (312) 675-6128 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-10-14


New


$10,800,000


$10,800,000


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link




	2016-08-26


New


Yet to Sell


$0


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 Godefriedus (Govert) Heijboer 
 Executive 


 Tobias Hekster 
 Director 


 N/A True Partner Advisor Hong Kong Limited 
 Executive 


 N/A True Partner Advisor Limited 
 Executive 


 N/A True Partner Capital Usa Holding, Inc. 
 Executive 


 N/A True Partner Volatility Gp, Llc 
 Executive 


 Roy Van Bakel 
 Executive 


 Ralph Van Put 
 Executive 













Contact - LSV Asset Management








































LSV Asset ManagementValue Equity Investment SpecialistsHOME
ABOUT LSV
PEOPLE

Investment Team
Operations Team
Compliance Team
Client Services Team
New Business Development


PRODUCTS

U.S. Strategies
Non U.S. Strategies
Global Strategies
Regional Strategies


MUTUAL FUNDS

Value Equity Fund
Conservative Value Equity Fund
Small Cap Value Fund
Global Value Fund
U.S. Managed Volatility Fund
Global Managed Volatility Fund
LSV Funds PLC


WHAT’S NEW
CONTACT
Contact


Client Services
James W. Owens, Jr.
    Partner & Director, Client Portfolio Services
    Tel: 312-460-2323 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | jowens@lsvasset.com 
Keith W. Bruch, CFA
    Partner & Director, Client Portfolio Services
    Tel: 312-460-2336 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | kbruch@lsvasset.com 
Peter M. Young, CFA
    Partner & Director, Client Portfolio Services
    Tel: 312-460-2337 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | pyoung@lsvasset.com 
Scott S. Kemper
    Partner & Director, Client Portfolio Services
    Tel: 312-327-4334 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | skemper@lsvasset.com 
Paul J. Halpern, Ph.D.
    Director, Client Portfolio Services, Canada
    Tel: 416-738-0463 | Fax: 416-515-7090 | phalpern@lsvasset.com 
David G. Beata
    Partner & Senior Analyst, Client Portfolio Services
    Tel: 312-460-2338 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | dbeata@lsvasset.com 
Michael Wagner
    Director, Taft-Hartley Sales & Services
    Tel: 312-242-2480 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | mwagner@lsvasset.com 
Marisa Rosenblatt
    Marketing & Client Service Analyst, RFP / Marketing / Database Questions
    Tel: 312-242-2489 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | mrosenblatt@lsvasset.com 



Headquarters Office
155 North Wacker Drive
Suite 4600 | Chicago, IL 60606
Tel: (312) 460-2443 | Fax: (312) 220-9241

New Business Development
Jason Ciaglo
    Director of New Business Development
    Tel: 312-242-2483 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | jciaglo@lsvasset.com 
David Coon
    Director, Retail Sales and Service
    Tel: 312-327-4285 | Fax: 312-327-5065 | dcoon@lsvasset.com 




Driving Directions
LSV is located in downtown Chicago at 155 North Wacker Drive. (Corner of Wacker and Randolph)
Directions from O’Hare International Airport:
Start out going East on I-190 E. I-190 E becomes Kennedy Exwy I-90 E towards downtown Chicago.
Take the E. Washington Blvd / 100 N. exit- exit number 51C. Turn left onto W. Washington Blvd.
After crossing over the Chicago River, turn left onto Wacker Drive. 155 North Wacker is on the right just after the intersection at Randolph.

















WHO WE ARE

About LSV
In The News
Research
Disclosures
Contact


PRODUCTS

U.S. Strategies
Non U.S. Strategies
Global Strategies
Regional Strategies


MUTUAL FUNDS

Value Equity Fund
Conservative Value Equity Fund
Small Cap Value Fund
Global Value Fund
Global Managed Volatility Fund
U.S. Managed Volatility Fund
LSV Funds PLC


PEOPLE

Investment Team
Operations Team
Compliance Team
Client Services Team
New Business Development


 

© 2016 LSV Asset Management. All rights reserved.
























SEC.gov | Mutual Funds and Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs) – A Guide for Investors


















      Skip to main content
    









 Search SEC.gov     

Company Filings | More Search Options










U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission









Show — Main navigation
Hide — Main navigation


About


What We Do


Commissioners


Securities Laws


SEC Docket


Reports and Publications


Careers


Contact




Divisions


Corporation Finance


Enforcement


Investment Management


Economic and Risk Analysis


Trading and Markets


National Exam Program


All Divisions and Offices




Enforcement


Litigation Releases


Administrative Proceedings


Opinions and Adjudicatory Orders


Accounting and Auditing


Trading Suspensions


How Investigations Work


Administrative Law Judges




Regulation


Rulemaking Index


Proposed Rules


Final Rules


Interim Final Temporary Rules


Other Orders and Notices


Self-Regulatory Organizations


Staff Interpretations




Education


Investor.gov


Check Out a Broker or Adviser


Investor Alerts and Bulletins


Fast Answers


File a Tip or Complaint


Publications




Filings


EDGAR Search Tools


Company Filing Search


How to Search EDGAR


Requesting Public Documents


Forms List


Information for Filers


About EDGAR




News


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speeches


Testimony


Spotlight Topics


What's New


Upcoming Events


Webcasts


SEC Videos


Media Gallery






















U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission


Divisions


Enforcement


Regulation


Education


Filings


Newsroom




Newsroom


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speehes


Testimony




RSS Feeds


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speeches


Testimony




Social Media


@SEC_News


SEC Channel


SEC Photostream









Search SEC.gov



 



Company Filings | More Search Options













 
            Investor Publications
                   
          










































Mutual Funds and Exchange-Traded Funds (ETFs) – A Guide for Investors



American investors often turn to mutual funds and exchange-traded funds (ETFs) to save for retirement and other financial goals.  Although mutual funds and exchange-traded funds have similarities, they have differences that may make one option preferable for any particular investor.  This brochure explains the basics of mutual fund and ETF investing, how each investment option works, the potential costs associated with each option, and how to research a particular investment.
U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Office of Investor Education and Advocacy
100 F Street, NE
Washington, DC  20549-0213
Toll-free:  (800) 732-0330
Website:  www.Investor.gov
 
Table of Contents
 
How Mutual Funds and ETFs Work
How Mutual Funds Work
How ETFs Work
Common Features of Mutual Funds and ETFs
Factors to Consider
Before Investing in Mutual Funds or ETFs
Different Types of Mutual Funds and ETFs
Different Types of Investment Strategies
How Mutual Funds and ETFs can Provide Returns to Investors
Things That Could Reduce Mutual Funds’ and ETFs’ Returns
Fees and Expenses
Classes of Mutual Funds
Tax Consequences
Sources of Information
Avoiding Common Pitfalls
Past Performance
Looking Beyond a Mutual Fund or ETF Name
Bank Products versus Mutual Funds
If You Have a Question or Complaint
Glossary of Key Mutual Fund and ETF Terms

Key Points to Remember

Mutual funds and ETFs are not guaranteed or insured by the FDIC or any other government agency—even if you buy through a bank and the fund carries the bank’s name.  You can lose money investing in mutual funds or ETFs.


Past performance is not a reliable indicator of future performance, so don’t be dazzled by last year’s high returns.  But past performance can help you assess a fund’s volatility over time.


All mutual funds and ETFs have costs that lower your investment returns.  Shop around and compare fees.


How Mutual Funds and ETFs Work
How Mutual Funds Work
A mutual fund is an SEC-registered open-end investment company that pools money from many investors and invests the money in stocks, bonds, short-term money-market instruments, other securities or assets, or some combination of these investments.  The combined securities and assets the mutual fund owns are known as its portfolio, which is managed by an SEC-registered investment adviser.  Each mutual fund share represents an investor’s proportionate ownership of the mutual fund’s portfolio and the income the portfolio generates. 
Investors in mutual funds buy their shares from, and sell/redeem their shares to, the mutual funds themselves.  Mutual fund shares are typically purchased from the fund directly or through investment professionals like brokers.  Mutual funds are required by law to price their shares each business day and they typically do so after the major U.S. exchanges close.  This price—the per-share value of the mutual fund’s assets minus its liabilities—is called the NAV or net asset value.  Mutual funds must sell and redeem their shares at the NAV that is calculated after the investor places a purchase or redemption order.  This means that, when an investor places a purchase order for mutual fund shares during the day, the investor won’t know what the purchase price is until the next NAV is calculated.





Types of Investment Companies
There are three basic types of investment companies:

Open-end investment companies or open-end funds—which sell shares on a continuous basis, purchased from, and redeemed by, the fund (or through a broker for the fund);
Closed-end investment companies or closed-end funds—which sell a fixed number of shares at one time (in an initial public offering) that later trade on a secondary market; and
Unit Investment Trusts (UITs)—which make a one-time public offering of only a specific, fixed number of redeemable securities called units and which will terminate and dissolve on a date that is specified at the time the UIT is created.

Mutual funds are open-end funds.  ETFs are generally structured as open-end funds, but can also be structured as UITs.  ETFs operate pursuant to SEC exemptive orders. 





How ETFs Work
Like mutual funds, ETFs are SEC-registered investment companies that offer investors a way to pool their money in a fund that makes investments in stocks, bonds, other assets or some combination of these investments and, in return, to receive an interest in that investment pool. Unlike mutual funds, however, ETFs do not sell individual shares directly to, or redeem their individual shares directly from, retail investors.  Instead, ETF shares are traded throughout the day on national stock exchanges and at market prices that may or may not be the same as the NAV of the shares.  
ETF sponsors enter into contractual relationships with one or more Authorized Participants —financial institutions which are typically large broker-dealers.  Typically, only Authorized Participants purchase and redeem shares directly from the ETF.  In addition, they can do so only in large blocks (e.g., 50,000 ETF shares) commonly called creation units, and they typically “pay” for the creation units in an in-kind exchange with a group or basket of securities and other assets that generally mirrors the ETF’s portfolio. 
Once an Authorized Participant receives the block of ETF shares, the Authorized Participant may sell the ETF shares in the secondary market to investors.  An ETF share is trading at a premium when its market price is higher than the value of its underlying holdings.  An ETF share is trading at a discount when its market price is lower than the value of its underlying holdings.  A history of the end-of-day premiums and discounts that an ETF experiences—i.e., its NAV per share compared to its closing market price per share —can usually be found on the website of the ETF or its sponsor.  Like a mutual fund, an ETF must calculate its NAV at least once every day. 





A Word about Exchange-Traded Products (ETPs)
ETFs are just one type of investment within a broader category of financial products called exchange-traded products (ETPs).  ETPs constitute a diverse class of financial products that seek to provide investors with exposure to financial instruments, financial benchmarks, or investment strategies across a wide range of asset classes.  ETP trading occurs on national securities exchanges and other secondary markets, making ETPs widely available to market participants including individual investors.
Other types of ETPs include exchange-traded commodity funds and exchange-traded notes (ETNs).  Exchange-traded commodity funds are structured as trusts or partnerships that physically hold a precious metal or that hold a portfolio of futures or other derivatives contracts on certain commodities or currencies.  ETNs are secured debt obligations of financial institutions that trade on a securities exchange.  ETN payment terms are linked to the performance of a reference index or benchmark, representing the ETN’s investment objective.  ETNs are complex, involve many risks for interested investors, and can result in the loss of the entire investment.
This brochure discusses only ETFs that are registered as open-end investment companies or unit investment trusts under the Investment Company Act of 1940.  It does not address other types of ETPs, such as exchange-traded commodity funds or ETNs.





Common Features of Mutual Funds and ETFs
Some common features of mutual funds and ETFs are described below.  Whether any particular feature is an advantage or disadvantage for you will depend on your unique circumstances—always be sure that the investment you are considering has the features that are important to you.

Professional Management.  Most funds and ETFs are managed by investment advisers who are registered with the SEC.
Diversification.  Spreading investments across a wide range of companies or industry sectors can help lower risk if a company or sector fails.  Many investors find it less expensive to achieve such diversification through ownership of certain mutual funds or certain ETFs than through ownership of individual stocks or bonds.
Low Minimum Investment.  Some mutual funds accommodate investors who don’t have a lot of money to invest by setting relatively low dollar amounts for the initial purchase, subsequent monthly purchases, or both.  Similarly, ETF shares can often be purchased on the market for relatively low dollar amounts. 
Liquidity and Trading Convenience.  Mutual fund investors can readily redeem their shares at the next calculated NAV—minus any fees and charges assessed on redemption—on any business day.  Mutual funds must send investors payment for the shares within seven days, but many funds provide payment sooner.  ETF investors can trade their shares on the market at any time the market is open at the market price—minus any fees and charges incurred at the time of sale.  ETF and mutual fund shares traded through a broker are required to settle in three business days.
Costs Despite Negative Returns.  Investors in mutual funds must pay sales charges, annual fees, management fees and other expenses, regardless of how the mutual fund performs.  Investors may also have to pay taxes on any capital gains distribution they receive.  Investors in ETFs must pay brokerage commissions, annual fees, management fees and other expenses, regardless of how the ETF performs.  ETF investors may also have to pay taxes on any capital gains distributions; however, because of the structure of certain ETFs that redeem proceeds in kind, taxes on ETF investments have historically been lower than those for mutual fund investments.   It is important to note that the tax efficiency of ETFs is not relevant if an investor holds the mutual fund or ETF investment in a tax-advantaged account, such as an IRA or a 401(k).
Lack of Control.  Investors in both mutual funds and ETFs cannot directly influence which securities are included in the funds’ portfolios.
Potential Price Uncertainty.  With an individual stock or an ETF, an investor can obtain real-time (or close to real-time) pricing information with relative ease by checking financial websites or by calling a broker.  By contrast, with a mutual fund, the price at which an investor purchases or redeems shares will depend on the fund’s NAV, which the fund might not calculate until many hours after an order has been placed. 

Factors to Consider
Before Investing in Mutual Funds or ETFs:

Determine your financial goals and risk tolerance.  When it comes to investing in mutual funds and ETFs, investors have thousands of choices.  Before you invest in any mutual fund or ETF, you must decide whether the investment strategy and risks are a good fit for you.  You should also consider more generally whether the unique style of investing of the mutual fund’s or ETF’s sponsor is a good fit for you.  The first step to successful investing is to figure out your current financial goals and risk tolerance—either on your own or with the help of an investment professional. 
Beware of risk.  All investments carry some level of risk.  An investor can lose some or all of the money he or she invests—the principal—because securities held by a fund go up and down in value.  Dividend payments may also fluctuate as market conditions change.  Mutual funds and ETFs have different risks and rewards.  Generally, the higher the potential return, the higher the risk of loss. 
Consider the sponsor’s investing style.  Before you invest, you may want to research the sponsor of the mutual fund or ETF you are considering.  The sponsor’s website is often a good place to begin, and it is helpful to spend some time browsing through the website to get a better understanding of the sponsor’s underlying philosophy on investing.  Each sponsor has its own style of investing that will affect how it manages its mutual funds and ETFs.  It is helpful to understand each sponsor’s style of investing, so you can better choose the right investment for you.
Ask and check.  Before you engage an investment professional or purchase shares of a mutual fund or ETF, make sure you research and verify relevant information to determine which option is best suited for you. 
	
Investment professionals:  Details on an investment professional’s background and qualifications are available on the SEC’s Investment Adviser Public Disclosure (IAPD) website or on the SEC’s website for individual investors, Investor.gov.  If you have any questions about checking the background of an investment professional, you can call the SEC’s toll-free investor assistance line at (800) 732-0330 for help.
Mutual funds and ETFs: You can research a mutual fund or ETF by reading its prospectus carefully to learn about its investment strategy and the potential risks.  You can find the prospectus on the mutual fund’s or ETF’s website or on the SEC’s EDGAR database and download the documents for free.








A Word about Derivatives
Derivatives are financial instruments whose performance is derived, at least in part, from the performance of an underlying asset, security, or index.  Even small market movements can dramatically affect their value, sometimes in unpredictable ways.
There are many types of derivatives with many different uses.  A mutual fund’s or ETF’s prospectus will disclose whether and how it may use derivatives.  An investor may also want to call a fund and ask how it uses these instruments.





Different Types of Mutual Funds And ETFs
Mutual funds and ETFs fall into several main categories.  Some are bond funds (also called fixed income funds), and some are stock funds (also called equity funds).  There are also funds that invest in a combination of these categories, such as balanced funds and target date funds, and newer types of funds such as alternative funds, smart-beta funds and esoteric ETFs.  In addition, there are money market funds, which are a specific type of mutual fund. 

Bond Funds 

Bond funds invest primarily in bonds or other types of debt securities. They generally have higher risks than money market funds, largely because they typically pursue strategies aimed at producing higher yields.  Unlike money market funds, the SEC’s rules do not restrict bond funds to high-quality or short-term investments.  Because there are many different types of bonds, bond funds can vary dramatically in their risks and rewards. 
Some of the risks associated with bond funds include:

Credit Risk—the possibility that companies or other issuers whose bonds are owned by the fund may fail to pay their debts (including the debt owed to holders of their bonds).  Credit risk is less of a factor for bond funds that invest in insured bonds or U.S. Treasury Bonds.  By contrast, those that invest in the bonds of companies with poor credit ratings generally will be subject to higher risk;
Interest Rate Risk—the risk that the market value of the bonds will go down when interest rates go up.  Because of this, an investor can lose money in any bond fund, including those that invest only in insured bonds or U.S. Treasury Bonds.  Funds that invest in longer-term bonds tend to have higher interest rate risk; and,
Prepayment Risk—the chance that a bond will be paid off early.  For example, if interest rates fall, a bond issuer may decide to pay off (or retire) its debt and issue new bonds that pay a lower rate.  When this happens, the fund may not be able to reinvest the proceeds in an investment with as high a return or yield.


Stock Funds 

Stock funds invest primarily in stocks, which are also known as equities.  Although a stock fund’s value can rise and fall quickly (and dramatically) over the short term, historically, stocks have performed better over the long term than other types of investments—including corporate bonds, government bonds, and treasury securities. 
Stock funds can be subject to various investment risks, including Market Risk, which poses the greatest potential danger for investors in stock funds.  Stock prices can fluctuate for a broad range of reasons—such as the overall strength of the economy or demand for particular products or services.

Balanced Funds

Balanced funds invest in stocks and bonds and sometimes money market instruments in an attempt to reduce risk but still provide capital appreciation and income.  They are also known as asset allocation funds and typically hold a relatively fixed allocation of the categories of portfolio instruments.  But the allocation will differ from balanced fund to balanced fund.  These funds are designed to reduce risk by diversifying among investment categories, but they still share the same risks that are associated with the underlying types of instruments.

Target Date Funds

Also called target date retirement funds or lifecycle funds, these funds also invest in stocks, bonds, and other investments.  Target date funds are designed to be long-term investments for individuals with particular retirement dates in mind.  The name of the fund often refers to its target retirement date or target date.  For example, there are funds with names such as “Portfolio 2050,” “Retirement Fund 2050,” or “Target 2050” that are designed for individuals who intend to retire in or near the year 2050.  Most target date funds are designed so that the fund’s allocation of investments will automatically change over time in a way that is intended to become more conservative as the target date approaches.  That means that funds typically shift over time from a mix with a lot of stock investments in the beginning to a mix weighted more toward bonds.  
Even if they share the same target date, target date funds may have very different investment strategies and risks and the timing of their allocation changes may be different.  They also may have different investment results and may charge different fees.  Often a target date fund invests in other funds, and fees may be charged by both the target date fund and the other funds.  In addition, target date funds do not guarantee that an investor will have sufficient retirement income at the target date, and investors can lose money.  Target date funds are generally associated with the same risks as the underlying investments.

Alternative Funds 

Alternative funds are funds that invest in alternative investments such as non-traditional asset classes (e.g., global real estate or currencies) and illiquid assets (e.g., private debt) and/or employ non-traditional trading strategies (e.g., selling short).  They are sometimes called “hedge funds for the masses” because they are a way to get hedge fund-like exposure in a registered fund.  These funds generally seek to produce positive returns that are not closely correlated to traditional investments or benchmarks.  Many investors may see alternative funds as a way to diversify their portfolios while retaining liquidity.  The risks associated with these investments vary depending on the assets and trading strategies employed.  These funds can employ complicated investment strategies, and their fees and expenses are commonly higher than traditionally managed funds.  In addition, these types of funds generally have limited performance histories, and it is unclear how they will perform in periods of market stress.  

Smart-Beta Funds

These funds are index funds with a twist. They compose their index by ranking stock using preset factors relating to risk and return, such as growth or value, and not simply by market capitalization as most traditional index funds do.  They aim to achieve better returns than traditional index funds, but at a lower cost than active funds.  These funds can be more complicated and have higher expenses than traditional index funds, and the factors are sometimes based on hypothetical, backward-looking returns.  In addition, these types of funds generally have limited performance histories, and it is unclear how they will perform in periods of market stress.  

Esoteric ETFs

Esoteric or exotic funds are ETFs that focus on niche investments or narrowly focused strategies.  They may be complicated investments and may have higher expenses.  In addition, these ETFs are often thinly traded, which means they can be harder to sell and may have larger bid-ask spreads than ETFs that aren’t as thinly traded. 





A Word about Hedge Funds 
Hedge fund is a general, non-legal term used to describe private, unregistered investment pools that traditionally have been limited to sophisticated, wealthy investors. Hedge funds are not mutual funds and, as such, are not subject to the numerous regulations that apply to mutual funds for the protection of investors — including regulations requiring that mutual fund shares be redeemable at any time, regulations protecting against conflicts of interest, regulations to assure fairness in the pricing of fund shares, disclosure regulations, regulations limiting the use of leverage, and more.






Money Market Funds 

Money market funds are a type of mutual fund that has relatively low risks compared to other mutual funds and ETFs (and most other investments).  By law, they can invest in only certain high-quality, short-term investments issued by the U.S. Government, U.S. corporations, and state and local governments.  Government and retail money market funds try to keep their NAV at a stable $1.00 per share, but the NAV may fall below $1.00 if the fund’s investments perform poorly.  Investor losses have been rare, but they are possible. 

A Government Money Market Fund is a money market fund that invests 99.5% or more of its total assets in cash, government securities and/or repurchase agreements that are collateralized solely by government securities or cash.
A Retail Money Market Fund is a money market fund that has policies and procedures reasonably designed to limit all beneficial owners of the money market fund to natural persons. 

Other money market funds, however, have a floating NAV like other mutual funds that fluctuates along with changes in the market-based value of their portfolio securities. 
All money market funds pay dividends that generally reflect short-term interest rates, and historically the returns for money market funds have been lower than for either bond or stock funds.  A risk commonly associated with money market funds is Inflation Risk, which is the risk that inflation will outpace and erode investment returns over time.
Different Types of Investment Strategies

Index-based Funds

Index-based mutual funds and ETFs seek to track an underlying securities index and achieve returns that closely correspond to the returns of that index with low fees.  They generally invest primarily in the component securities of the index and typically have lower management fees than actively managed funds.  Some index funds may also use derivatives (such as options or futures) to help achieve their investment objective.  Index-based funds with seemingly similar benchmarks can actually be quite different and can deliver very different returns.  For example, some index funds invest in all of the companies included in an index; other index funds invest in a representative sample of the companies included in an index.  Because an index fund tracks the securities on a particular index, it may have less flexibility than a non-index fund to react to price declines in the securities contained in the index.  Also because market indexes themselves have no expenses, even a passively managed index fund can underperform its index due to fees and taxes.

Actively Managed Funds

The adviser of an actively managed mutual fund or ETF may buy or sell components in the portfolio on a daily basis without regard to conformity with an index, provided that the trades are consistent with the overall investment objective of the fund.  Unlike similar mutual funds, actively managed ETFs are required to publish their holdings daily.  Because there is no underlying index that can serve as a point of reference for investors and other market participants as to the ETF’s holdings, disclosing the specific fund holdings ensures that market participants have sufficient information to engage in activity, called arbitrage, that works to keep the market price of ETF shares closely linked to the ETF’s underlying value.   





A Word on Active and Passive Investing
An active investment strategy relies on the skill of an investment manager to construct and manage the portfolio of a fund in an effort to provide exposure to certain types of investments or outperform an investment benchmark or index.  An actively managed fund has the potential to outperform the market, but its performance is dependent on the skill of the manager.  Also, actively managed funds historically have had higher management fees, which can significantly lower investment returns.  The shareholder is paying for more active management of portfolio assets, which often leads to higher turnover costs in the portfolio and potentially negative federal income tax consequences.  
Passive investing is an investment strategy that is designed to achieve approximately the same return as a particular market index, before fees.  The strategy can be implemented by replication—purchasing 100% of the securities in the same proportion as in the index or benchmark—or by a representative sampling of stocks in the index.  Passive investing also typically comes with lower management fees.  As discussed above, passively managed mutual funds are typically called index funds. 
Most ETFs are also passively managed, although there are some actively managed ETFs on the market.  Passively managed ETFs typically have lower costs for the same reasons index mutual funds do.  In addition, index-based ETFs’ costs and taxes can be even lower than index mutual funds’ because of the manner in which ETFs operate.






Leveraged, inverse and inverse leveraged ETFs

Leveraged, inverse, and inverse leveraged ETFs seek to achieve a daily return that is a multiple, inverse, or inverse multiple of the daily return of a securities index.  These ETFs are a subset of index-based ETFs because they track a securities index.  They seek to achieve their stated objectives on a daily basis.  Investors should be aware that the performance of these ETFs over a period longer than one day will probably differ significantly from their stated daily performance objectives.  These ETFs often employ techniques such as engaging in short sales and using swaps, futures contracts and other derivatives that can expose the ETF, and by extension the ETF investors, to a host of risks.  As such, these are specialized products that typically are not suitable for buy-and-hold investors.





A Word about Exchange-Traded Managed Funds (ETMF)
An exchange-traded managed fund (ETMF) is a new kind of registered investment company that is a hybrid between traditional mutual funds and exchange-traded funds.  Like ETFs, ETMFs list and trade on a national exchange, directly issue and redeem shares only in creation units, and primarily use in-kind transfers of the basket of portfolio securities in issuing and redeeming creation units.  Like mutual funds, ETMFs are bought and sold at prices linked to NAV and disclose their portfolio holdings quarterly with a 60-day delay.  This structure may allow the product to provide certain cost and tax efficiencies of ETFs while maintaining the confidentiality of the current holdings similar to mutual funds.  By not having to disclose their holdings on a daily basis as ETFs do, ETMFs may have an advantage in trying to outperform their benchmarks over time because they are less susceptible to front running by other investors who would be able to trade on the holdings’ disclosures.





How Mutual Funds and ETFs Can Provide Returns to Investors
Investors can make money from their investments in three ways:
1.  Dividend Payments—Depending on the underlying securities, a mutual fund or ETF may earn income in the form of dividends on the securities in its portfolio.  The mutual fund or ETF then pays its shareholders nearly all of the income (minus disclosed expenses) it has earned.
2.  Capital Gains Distributions—The price of the securities a mutual fund or ETF owns may increase.  When a mutual fund or ETF sells a security that has increased in price, the mutual fund or ETF has a capital gain.  At the end of the year, most mutual funds and ETFs distribute these capital gains (minus any capital losses) to shareholders.  ETFs seek to minimize these capital gains by making in-kind exchanges to redeeming Authorized Participants instead of selling portfolio securities.
3.  Increased NAV/Increased Market Price—If the market value of a mutual fund’s portfolio increases, after deduction of expenses and liabilities, then the net asset value of the mutual fund and its shares increases.  If the market value of an ETF’s portfolio increases, after deduction of expenses and liabilities, then the net asset value of the ETF increases, and the market price of its shares may also increase.
With respect to dividend payments and capital gains distributions, mutual funds usually will give investors a choice: the mutual fund can send the investor a check or other form of payment, or the investor can have the dividends or distributions reinvested in the mutual fund to buy more shares (often without paying an additional sales load). If an ETF investor wants to reinvest a dividend payment or capital gains distribution, the process can be more complicated and the investor may have to pay additional brokerage commissions.  Investors should check with their ETF or investment professional.
Things That Could Reduce Mutual Funds’ and ETFs’ Returns
Investors should consider the effect that fees, expenses, and taxes will have on their returns over time.  They can significantly reduce the returns on mutual funds and ETFs. 
Fees and Expenses
As with any business, running a mutual fund or ETF involves costs.  Funds pass along these costs to investors by imposing fees and expenses.
Shareholder fees are fees charged directly to mutual fund investors in connection with transactions such as buying, selling, or exchanging shares, or on a periodic basis with respect to account fees.  An investor can find these fees and charges listed in the “Fee Table” section of a mutual fund’s prospectus or summary prospectus under the heading, “Shareholder Fees.”  ETFs don’t charge these fees directly to investors, but they may have several types of transaction fees and costs, which are described below.
Operating expenses are ongoing mutual fund and ETF costs such as investment advisory fees for managing the fund’s holdings, marketing and distribution expenses, as well as custodial, transfer agency, legal, and accountant’s fees.  Operating expenses are regular and recurring fund-wide expenses that are typically paid out of fund assets, which means that investors indirectly pay these costs.  These expenses are identified in the “Fee Table” section of a mutual fund’s or ETF’s prospectus or summary prospectus under the heading, “Annual Fund Operating Expenses.”  Although these fees and expenses may not be listed individually as specific line items on an account statement, they can have a substantial impact on an investment over time. 
Fees and expenses vary from fund to fund.  If the funds are otherwise the same, a fund with lower fees will outperform a fund with higher fees.  Remember, the more investors pay in fees and expenses, the less money they will have in their investment portfolio.  As noted above, index funds typically have lower fees than actively managed funds.
Prospectus Fee Table
The following discussion details the disclosure required in the fee table in a mutual fund or ETF prospectus.  ETFs don’t charge shareholder fees (that are required to be included in the fee table) directly to investors.  But, they may have several types of transaction fees and costs which are also described below.
Fee Table:  Shareholder Fees for mutual funds (fees paid directly from an investment)

Sales Charge (Load) on Purchases—a fee some mutual funds charge investors when they buy shares, also known as a front-end load.   This fee is typically paid to the broker that sells the mutual fund’s shares.  In this respect, a sales load is like a commission investors pay when they purchase any type of security (like a stock or an ETF) from a broker.  Front-end loads reduce the amount of an investment.  For example, let’s say an investor has $1,000 and wants to invest it in a mutual fund with a 5% front-end load.  The $50 sales load the investor must pay comes off the top of the investment leaving the remaining $950 to be invested in the mutual fund.  


Purchase Fee—a fee some mutual funds charge investors when they buy shares.  Unlike a front-end sales load, a purchase fee is paid into fund assets (not to a broker) and is typically imposed to defray some of the mutual fund’s costs associated with the purchase.  This fee is often imposed by a mutual fund that has high transaction costs, for example, because of its investment strategy.  The fee is designed so that the other investors’ investments in the mutual fund are not diminished by the transaction costs of the purchase.  Like front-end sales loads, purchase fees reduce the amount of the investment.


Deferred Sales Charge (Load)—a fee some mutual funds charge investors when they sell or redeem their shares, also known as a back-end load.  This fee is typically paid to the broker that sells the mutual fund’s shares. The most common type of back-end sales load is the contingent deferred sales load (also known as the CDSC or CDSL).  The amount of this type of sales load will depend on how long the investor holds his or her shares.  It typically decreases to zero if the investor holds his or her shares for a specified time period.  When an investor purchases shares that are subject to a back-end sales load rather than a front-end sales load, no sales load is deducted at purchase, and all of the investors’ money is immediately used to purchase fund shares (assuming that no other fees or charges apply at the time of purchase).  However, a back-end sales load will reduce an investor’s return on the investment.  Typically, a fund calculates the amount of a back-end sales load based on the lesser of the value of the investor’s initial investment or the value of the investment at redemption.  


Redemption Fee—a fee some mutual funds charge investors when they sell or redeem their shares within a certain time frame of purchasing the shares. Unlike a deferred sales load, a redemption fee is paid into fund assets (not to the broker) and is typically used to defray fund costs associated with an investor’s redemption.  The SEC limits redemption fees to 2%. 


Exchange Fee—a fee some mutual funds charge investors when they exchange (transfer) their investment to another fund within the same fund group or family of funds. 


Account Fee—a fee some mutual funds charge investors in connection with the maintenance of their accounts.  For example, some funds impose an account maintenance fee on accounts whose value is less than a certain dollar amount.

Transaction fees and costs for ETFs not reflected in the Fee Table 

Brokerage Commissions—ETF investors typically pay their brokers sales commissions with each purchase or sale of ETF shares, although some ETFs may be available commission-free.  In this respect, a commission is like a sales load investors pay when purchasing or redeeming a mutual fund.  Like front-end sales loads, brokerage commissions on a purchase reduce the amount of the investment.  Like back-end sales loads, brokerage commissions on a sale reduce an investor’s return on the investment.  A brokerage commission may be structured as a flat fee charged every time an investor trades.  With a flat fee, the smaller the amount traded, the larger the percentage cost per trade is.  Investors should consider the fee structure of a commission when purchasing or selling ETF shares.  Check with your broker regarding these fees.  Brokers should provide written notice to customers of these charges when accounts are opened and when any of the charges change.


Bid-ask spread—ETFs and other securities that trade on a securities market actually have two market prices—the bid price and the ask price.  The term bid refers to the highest price a buyer will pay to buy a specified number of ETF shares at any given time.  The term ask refers to the lowest price at which a seller will sell the ETF shares.  The bid price will be lower than the ask price and the difference between two prices is called the spread.  An example is an ETF share that is trading for $59.50/$60.  The bid price is $59.50, the ask price is $60.00, and the spread is 50 cents.  If an investor buys 200 ETF shares at the ask price of $60 and sells them immediately at the bid price of $59.50, the investor would incur a loss of $100.  This example demonstrates the impact of the spread on an ETF investment.  ETFs that are more liquid and have higher trading volume have tighter or smaller spreads.  The spread can be thought of as a hidden cost to investors since spreads reduce potential returns.


Changes in discounts and premiums to NAV—For a variety of reasons, an ETF’s market price may reflect a premium or a discount to the ETF’s underlying value or NAV. This is a potential cost but also a potential gain.  An ETF share is trading at a premium when its market price is higher than the NAV or the value of its underlying holdings.  An ETF share is trading at a discount when its market price is lower than the NAV or value of its underlying holdings.  An investor may, therefore, pay more or less than the NAV when buying shares or receive more or less than NAV when selling shares.






A Word about Exchanging Shares
A family of funds is a group of mutual funds that share administrative and distribution systems. Each fund in a family may have different investment objectives and follow different strategies.
Some funds offer exchange privileges within a family of funds, allowing shareholders to directly transfer their holdings from one fund to another as their investment goals or tolerance for risk change. While some funds impose fees for exchanges, most funds typically do not. To learn more about a fund’s exchange policies, call the fund’s toll-free number, visit its website, or read the “Shareholder Information” section of the prospectus.
Bear in mind that exchanges have tax consequences. Even if the fund doesn’t charge for the transfer, the investor will be liable for any capital gain on the sale of the old shares or, depending on the circumstances, eligible to take a capital loss.





Fee Table:  Annual Fund Operating Expenses (annual expenses paid as a percentage of the value of an investment)

Management Fees—fees paid out of mutual fund or ETF assets to the fund’s investment adviser for investment portfolio management.  They can also include any other management fees payable to the fund’s investment adviser or its affiliates and administrative fees payable to the investment adviser that are not included in the Other Expenses category.


Distribution [and/or Service] (12b-1) Fees—fees paid out of mutual fund or ETF assets to cover the costs of distribution (e.g., marketing and selling fund shares) and sometimes to cover the costs of providing shareholder services.  Distribution Fees include fees to compensate brokers and others who sell fund shares and to pay for advertising, the printing and mailing of prospectuses to new investors, and the printing and mailing of sales literature.  Shareholder Service Fees are fees paid to persons to respond to investor inquiries and provide investors with information about their investments.  Shareholder service fees can be paid outside of 12b-1 fees, and if they are, they are included in the Other Expenses category. 


Other Expenses—fees paid out of mutual fund  or ETF assets that are not already included under Management Fees or Distribution or Service (12b-1 Fees) (such as any shareholder service expenses that are not already included in the 12b-1 fees), custodial expenses, legal and account expenses, transfer agent expenses and other administrative expenses.


Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses (Expense Ratio)—the line of the fee table that represents the total of a mutual fund’s or ETF’s annual fund operating expenses, expressed as a percentage of the fund’s average net assets.  Looking at the expense ratio can help investors make comparisons among various mutual funds and ETFs.

Investors should be sure to review carefully the fee tables of any mutual funds or ETFs they’re considering, including no-load mutual funds.  Even small differences in fees can translate into large differences in returns over time.  For example, if an investor invested $10,000 in a fund that produced a 5% annual return before expenses and had annual operating expenses of 1.5%, then after 20 years the investor could have roughly $19,612.  But if the fund had expenses of only 0.5%, then the investor would end up with $24,002—a 23% difference.





A Word about No-Load Mutual funds
Some mutual funds call themselves no-load.  As the name implies, this means that the mutual fund does not charge any type of sales load.  But, as discussed above, not every type of shareholder fee is a sales load.  A no-load fund may charge direct fees that are not sales loads, such as purchase fees, redemption fees, exchange fees, and account fees.  No-load funds also will have annual fund operating expenses that investors pay for indirectly through fund assets. 





Classes of Mutual Funds
Although ETFs offer only one class of shares, many mutual funds offer more than one class of shares.  Each class will invest in the same portfolio of securities and will have the same investment objectives and policies.  But each class will have different shareholder services and/or distribution arrangements with different fees and expenses.  Because of the different fees and expenses, each class will likely have different performance results.  A multi-class structure offers investors the ability to select a fee and expense structure that is most appropriate for their investment goals (including the time that they expect to remain invested in the fund).  Here are some key characteristics of the most common mutual fund share classes offered to individual investors:

Class A Shares—Class A shares typically charge a front-end sales load, but they tend to have a lower 12b-1 fee and lower annual expenses than other mutual fund share classes. Some mutual funds reduce the front-end load as the size of the investment increases.  These discounts are called breakpoints.


Class B Shares—Class B shares typically do not have a front-end sales load.  Instead, they may charge a contingent deferred sales load and a 12b-1 fee (along with other annual expenses).  Typically the amount of the contingent deferred sales load decreases the longer an investor holds the shares.  Class B shares also might convert automatically to a class with a lower 12b-1 fee and no contingent deferred sales load if the investor holds the shares long enough.


Class C Shares—Class C shares might have a 12b-1 fee, other annual expenses, and either a front-end or back-end sales load. But the front-end or back-end load for Class C shares tends to be lower than for Class A or Class B shares, respectively.  Unlike Class B shares, Class C shares generally do not convert to another class; as a result, the back-end load will not decrease over time.  Class C shares tend to have higher annual expenses than either Class A or Class B shares.


Other Classes— Other classes may also exist for some funds.






A Word about Breakpoints
Some mutual funds that charge front-end sales loads will charge lower sales loads for larger investments.  In the prospectus fee table, they are referred to as sales charge discounts, but the investment levels required to obtain a reduced sales load are more commonly referred to as breakpoints.
The SEC does not require a mutual fund to offer breakpoints in its sales load.  But, if the mutual fund offers breakpoints, the mutual fund must disclose them and brokers must apply them. In addition, a brokerage firm is not allowed to sell shares of a mutual fund in an amount that is just below the mutual fund’s breakpoint simply to earn a higher commission.
Each fund company establishes its own formula for how it will calculate whether an investor is entitled to receive a breakpoint.  For that reason, it is important for investors to seek out breakpoint information from their financial advisors or the mutual fund itself.  An investor will need to ask how a particular mutual fund establishes eligibility for breakpoint discounts, as well as what the mutual fund’s breakpoint amounts are.  Some of this information is also included in the “Fee Table” section of the mutual fund’s prospectus or summary prospectus.





Tax Consequences
When an investor buys and holds an individual stock or bond, the investor must pay income tax each year on the dividends or interest received. But the investor won’t have to pay any capital gains tax until he or she actually sells and unless he or she makes a profit.  Mutual funds and ETFs are somewhat different.
As with an individual stock, when an investor buys and holds mutual fund or ETF shares the investor will owe income tax each year on any dividends received.  In addition, the investor will also owe taxes on any personal capital gains in years when an investor sells shares. 
However, unlike with an individual stock, an investor may also have to pay taxes each year on the mutual fund’s or ETF’s capital gains even if the mutual fund or ETF has had a negative return and the investor hasn’t sold any shares. That’s because the law requires mutual funds and ETFs to distribute any net capital gains on the sale of portfolio securities to shareholders.  ETFs are typically more tax efficient in this regard than mutual funds because ETF shares are frequently redeemed in-kind by the Authorized Participants.  This means that an ETF may deliver specified portfolio securities to Authorized Participants who are redeeming creation units instead of selling portfolio securities to meet redemption demands.  The selling of portfolio securities could otherwise result in taxable capital gains to the ETF that would typically be passed through to the retail investor.  Nevertheless, the tax efficiency of ETFs is not relevant if an investor holds the mutual fund or ETF investment in a tax-advantaged account, such as an IRA or a 401(k).
SEC rules require mutual funds and ETFs to disclose in their prospectuses after-tax returns.  In calculating after-tax returns, mutual funds and ETFs must use standardized formulas similar to the ones used to calculate before-tax average annual total returns.  A fund’s after-tax returns are discussed in the “Investments, Risks and Performance” section of the prospectus.  When comparing mutual funds and/or ETFs, be sure to take taxes into account.





A Word about Tax Exempt Funds
If an investor invests in a tax-exempt fund—such as a municipal bond fund—some or all of the dividends will be exempt from federal (and sometimes state and local) income tax. The investor will, however, owe taxes on any capital gains.





Sources of Information
Prospectus and Summary Prospectus
Mutual funds must provide a copy of the fund’s prospectus to shareholders after they purchase shares, but investors can— and should—request and read the mutual fund’s prospectus before making an investment decision.  There are two kinds of prospectuses: (1) the statutory prospectus; and (2) the summary prospectus.  The statutory prospectus is the traditional, long-form prospectus with which most mutual fund investors are familiar.  The summary prospectus, which is used by many mutual funds, is just a few pages long and contains key information about a mutual fund.  The SEC specifies the kinds of information that must be included in mutual fund prospectuses and requires mutual funds to present the information in a standard format so that investors can readily compare different mutual funds.
The same key information required in the summary prospectus is required to be in the beginning of the statutory prospectus.  It appears in the following standardized order:  (1) investment objectives/goals; (2) fee table; (3) investments, risks, and performance; (4) management—investment advisers and portfolio managers; (5) purchase and sale of fund shares; (6) tax information; and (7) financial intermediary compensation.  Investors can also find more detailed information in the statutory prospectus, including financial highlights information.
An ETF will also have a prospectus, and some ETFs may have a summary prospectus, both of which are subject to the same legal requirements as mutual fund prospectuses and summary prospectuses.  All investors who purchase creation units (i.e., Authorized Participants) receive a prospectus.  Some broker-dealers also deliver a prospectus to secondary market purchasers.  All ETFs are required to deliver a prospectus upon request and without charge, and the prospectus will usually be available on the ETF’s website.
While they may seem daunting at first, mutual fund and ETF prospectuses contain valuable information.  Here’s some of what is included in mutual fund and ETF prospectuses:

Investment Objective — The prospectus will describe the mutual fund’s or ETF’s investment objectives or goals.  A fund may also identify its type or category (e.g., that it is a money market fund or balanced fund).
Fee Table — This table describes the mutual fund’s or ETF’s fees and expenses, which include the shareholder fees and annual fund operating expenses. The fee table includes an example that will help investors compare costs among different mutual funds or ETFs by showing them the costs associated with investing a hypothetical $10,000 over a 1-, 3-, 5-, and 10-year period.
Key Risks — The prospectus will discuss the mutual fund’s or ETF’s principal investment risks.
Financial Highlights Information — This section, which generally appears towards the back of the prospectus, contains audited data concerning the mutual fund’s or ETF’s financial performance for each of the past 5 years. Here an investor will find net asset values (for both the beginning and end of each period), total returns, and various ratios, including the ratio of expenses to average net assets, the ratio of net income to average net assets, and the portfolio turnover rate.

Statement of Additional Information (SAI)
The SAI explains a mutual fund’s or ETF’s operations in greater detail than the prospectus – including the mutual fund’s or ETF’s financial statements and details about the history of the mutual fund or ETF, its policies on borrowing and concentration, the identity of officers, directors and persons who control the mutual fund or ETF, investment advisory and other services, brokerage commissions paid on portfolio securities transactions, tax matters, and performance such as yield and average annual total return information.  If an investor asks, the mutual fund or ETF must send an SAI.  The back cover of the mutual fund’s or ETF’s prospectus should contain information on how to obtain the SAI.
Shareholder Reports 
A mutual fund also must provide shareholders with annual and semi-annual reports within 60 days after the end of the fund’s fiscal year and 60 days after the fund’s fiscal mid-year.  These reports contain updated financial information, a list of the fund’s portfolio securities, and other information.  The information in the shareholder reports will be current as of the date of the report (that is, the last day of the fund’s fiscal year for the annual report, and the last day of the fund’s fiscal mid-year for the semi-annual report).  Investors can obtain all of these documents by:

Visiting the mutual fund’s or ETF’s website;


Calling or writing to the mutual fund or ETF (all mutual funds and ETFs have toll-free telephone numbers);


Contacting a broker that sells the mutual fund’s or ETF’s shares;


Searching the SEC’s EDGAR database and downloading the documents for free; or


Contacting the SEC’s Office of Investor Education and Advocacy by telephone (800) 732-0330. 

Avoiding Common Pitfalls
Past Performance
A mutual fund’s or ETF’s past performance is not as important as one might think.  Advertisements, rankings, and ratings often emphasize how well a mutual fund or ETF has performed in the past.  But studies show that the future is often different.  This year’s number one mutual fund or ETF can easily become next year’s below average mutual fund or ETF.
For mutual funds and ETFs, be sure to find out how long the fund has been in existence.  Newly created or small mutual funds or ETFs sometimes have excellent short-term performance records.  Because newly created mutual funds and ETFs may invest in only a small number of stocks, a few successful stocks can have a large impact on their performance.  But as these mutual funds and ETFs grow larger and increase the number of stocks they own, each stock has less impact on performance.  This may make it more difficult to sustain initial results.
While past performance does not necessarily predict future returns, it can tell an investor how volatile (or stable) a mutual fund or ETF has been over a period of time.  Generally, the more volatile a fund, the higher the investment risk.  If you will need your money to meet a financial goal in the near-term, you probably can’t afford the risk of investing in a fund with a volatile history because you will not have enough time to ride out any declines in the stock market.
For index mutual funds and index ETFs, remember that these funds are designed to track a particular market index and their past performance is related to how well that market index did. 
Looking Beyond A Mutual Fund or ETF Name
Don’t assume that a mutual fund called the “ZYX Stock Fund” invests only in stocks or that the “Martian High-Yield Fund” invests only in the securities of companies headquartered on the planet Mars.  The SEC generally requires that any mutual fund or ETF with a name suggesting that it focuses on a particular type of investment must invest at least 80% of its assets in the type of investment suggested by its name.  But mutual funds and ETFs can still invest up to one-fifth of their holdings in other types of securities—including securities that a particular investor might consider too risky or perhaps not aggressive enough.
Bank Products Versus Mutual Funds
Many banks now sell mutual funds, some of which carry the bank’s name.  But mutual funds sold in banks, including money market funds, are not bank deposits.  As a result, they are not federally insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC).





Money Market Matters
Don’t confuse a money market fund with a money market deposit account.  The names are similar, but they are completely different.

A money market fund is a type of mutual fund.  It is not guaranteed or FDIC-insured.  When an investor buys shares in a money market fund, he or she should receive a prospectus. 


A money market deposit account is a bank deposit.  It is guaranteed and FDIC-insured.  When a saver deposits money in a money market deposit account, he or she should receive a Truth in Savings form.






If You Have a Question or Complaint
If you have a question or complaint about your mutual fund or ETF, you can send it to us using this online form. You can also reach us by regular mail, by telephone, or by fax at:
U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
Office of Investor Education and Advocacy
100 F Street, N.E.
Washington, D.C. 20549-0213
Toll-free:  (800) 732-0330
Fax:  (202) 772-9295
For more information about investing wisely and avoiding fraud, please check www.Investor.gov.
Glossary of Key Mutual Fund and ETF Terms
12b-1 Fees—fees paid out of mutual fund or ETF assets to cover the costs of marketing and selling mutual fund shares and sometimes to cover the costs of providing shareholder services. Distribution fees include fees to compensate brokers and others who sell fund shares and to pay for advertising, the printing and mailing of prospectuses to new investors, and the printing and mailing of sales literature. Shareholder Service Fees are fees paid to persons to respond to investor inquiries and provide investors with information about their investments.
Account Fee—a fee that some mutual funds separately charge investors for the maintenance of their accounts.  For example, accounts below a specified dollar amount may have to pay an account fee.
Authorized Participants—financial institutions, which are typically large broker-dealers, who enter into contractual relationships with ETFs to buy and redeem creation units of ETF shares.
Back-end Load—a sales charge (also known as a deferred sales charge) investors pay when they redeem (or sell) mutual fund shares; generally used by the mutual fund to compensate brokers.
Brokers—an individual who acts as an intermediary between a buyer and seller, usually charging a commission to execute trades.
Brokerage Commissions—A fee investors pay their brokers with each purchase or sale of ETF shares. 
Classes—different types of shares issued by a single mutual fund, often referred to as Class A shares, Class B shares, and so on. Each class invests in the same pool (or investment portfolio) of securities and has the same investment objectives and policies. But each class has different shareholder services and/or distribution arrangements with different fees and expenses and therefore different performance results.
Closed-End Fund—a type of investment company that does not continuously offer its shares for sale but instead sells a fixed number of shares at one time (in the initial public offering) which then typically trade on a secondary market, such as the New York Stock Exchange or the Nasdaq Stock Market – legally known as a closed-end investment company.
Contingent Deferred Sales Load—a type of back-end load, the amount of which depends on the length of time the investor held his or her mutual fund shares.  For example, a contingent deferred sales load might be (X)% if an investor holds his or her shares for one year, (X-1)% after two years, and so on until the load reaches zero and goes away completely.
Conversion—a feature some mutual funds offer that allows investors to automatically change from one class to another (typically with lower annual expenses) after a set period of time.  The mutual fund’s prospectus or summary prospectus will state whether a class ever converts to another class.
Creation Units—large blocks of shares of an ETF, typically 50,000 shares or more, usually sold in in-kind exchanges to Authorized Participants.
Deferred Sales Charge—see back-end load (above).
Discount to NAV—when an ETF’s market price is trading lower than the value of the underlying holdings. 
Distribution Fees—fees paid out of mutual fund or ETF assets to cover expenses for marketing and selling mutual fund or ETF shares, including advertising costs, compensation for brokers and others who sell mutual fund shares, and payments for printing and mailing prospectuses to new investors and sales literature prospective investors – sometimes referred to as 12b-1 fees.
Exchange Fee—a fee that some mutual funds charge shareholders if they exchange (transfer) to another mutual fund within the same fund group.
Exchange-Traded Funds—a type of an investment company (either an open-end company or UIT) that differs from traditional mutual funds, because shares issued by ETFs trade on a secondary market and are only redeemable by Authorized Participants from the fund itself in very large blocks (blocks of 50,000 shares for example) called creation units.
Expense Ratio—a mutual fund’s or ETF’s total annual operating expenses (including management fees, distribution (12b-1) fees, and other expenses) expressed as a percentage of average net assets.
Front-end Load—an upfront sales charge investors pay when they purchase mutual fund shares, generally used by the mutual fund to compensate brokers.  A front-end load reduces the amount available to purchase fund shares.
Index Fund or ETF—describes a type of mutual fund or ETF whose investment objective typically is to achieve the same return as a particular market index, such as the S&P 500 Composite Stock Price Index, the Russell 2000 Index, or the Wilshire 5000 Total Market Index.
Investment Adviser—generally, a person or entity who receives compensation for giving individually tailored advice to a specific person on investing in stocks, bonds, or mutual funds. Some investment advisers also manage portfolios of securities, including mutual funds.
Investment Company—a company (corporation, business trust, partnership, or limited liability company) that issues securities and is primarily engaged in the business of investing in securities. The three basic types of investment companies are open-end funds (mutual funds and most ETFs), closed-end funds, and unit investment trusts (some ETFs).
Load—see Sales Charge.
Management Fee—fee paid out of mutual fund or ETF assets to the fund’s investment adviser or its affiliates for managing the fund’s portfolio, any other management fee payable to the fund’s investment adviser or its affiliates, and any administrative fee payable to the investment adviser that are not included in the “Other Expenses” category.  A fund’s management fee appears as a category under “Annual Fund Operating Expenses” in the Fee Table.
Market Index—a measurement of the performance of a specific basket of stocks or bonds considered to represent a particular market or sector of the U.S. stock market or the economy. For example, the Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) is an index of 30 blue chip U.S. stocks of industrial companies (excluding transportation and utility companies).
Mutual Fund—the common name for an open-end investment company.  Like other types of investment companies, mutual funds pool money from many investors and invest the money in stocks, bonds, short-term money-market instruments, or other securities.  Mutual funds issue redeemable shares that investors purchase directly from the fund (or through a broker for the fund) instead of purchasing from investors on a secondary market.
NAV (Net Asset Value)—the per-share value of the mutual fund’s or ETF’s assets minus its liabilities. SEC rules require mutual funds and ETFs to calculate the NAV at least once daily.  To calculate the NAV per share, a fund subtracts the fund’s liabilities from its assets and then divides the result by the number of shares outstanding.
No-load Fund—a mutual fund that does not charge any type of sales load. But not every type of shareholder fee is a sales load, and a no-load fund may charge fees that are not sales loads.  No-load funds also charge operating expenses.
Open-End Company—the legal name for a mutual fund and most ETFs.  An open-end company is a type of investment company.
Operating Expenses—the costs a mutual fund or ETF incurs in connection with running the fund, including management fees, distribution (12b-1) fees, and other expenses.
Portfolio—an individual’s or entity’s combined holdings of stocks, bonds, or other securities and assets.
Premium to NAV—when an ETF’s market price is trading higher than the value of the underlying holdings.
Prospectus—disclosure document that describes the mutual fund or ETF.  Each mutual fund or ETF has a prospectus.  The prospectus contains information about the fund’s costs, investment objectives, risks, and performance.  You can get a prospectus from the mutual fund company or ETF sponsor (through its website or by phone or mail).  Your financial professional or broker can also provide you with a copy.
Purchase Fee—a shareholder fee that some mutual funds charge when investors purchase mutual fund shares.  Not the same as (and may be in addition to) a front-end load.
Redemption Fee—a shareholder fee that some mutual funds charge when investors redeem (or sell) mutual fund shares within a certain time frame of purchasing the shares. Redemption fees (which must be paid to the fund) are not the same as (and may be in addition to) a back-end load (which is typically paid to a broker). The SEC generally limits redemption fees to 2%.
Sales Charge (or Load)—the amount that investors pay when they purchase (front-end load) or redeem (back-end load) shares in a mutual fund, similar to a brokerage commission.
Secondary Market—markets where existing securities are bought and sold.
Shareholder Fees—fees charged directly to investors in connection with particular investor transactions such as buying, selling, or exchanging shares or periodically with respect to account fees including sales loads, purchase or redemption fees.
Shareholder Service Fees—fees paid out of mutual fund or ETF assets to persons to respond to investor inquiries and provide investors with information about their investments.  See also 12b-1 fees.
Statement of Additional Information (SAI)—disclosure document that provides information about a mutual fund or ETF in addition to, and sometimes in more detail, than the prospectus. Although mutual funds and ETFs are not required to provide investors with the SAI, they must give investors the SAI upon request and without charge.
Summary Prospectus—a disclosure document that summarizes key information for mutual funds and ETFs.
Total Annual Fund Operating Expense—the total of a mutual fund’s or ETF’s annual fund operating expenses, expressed as a percentage of the fund’s average net assets. The total annual fund operating expenses is included in the fund’s fee table in the prospectus.
Unit Investment Trust (UIT)—a type of investment company that typically makes a one-time public offering of only a specific, fixed number of units.  A UIT will terminate and dissolve on a date established when the UIT is created (although some may terminate more than fifty years after they are created).  UITs do not actively trade their investment portfolios.











          Modified: Jan. 26, 2017
      










STAY CONNECTED
1 Twitter 2 Facebook 3RSS 4YouTube
5 Flickr  6LinkedIn 7 Pinterest 8 Email Updates 




































































Options Investing - Tracking Options - Options Trading


























Bulletin






Investor Alert























  
      Options
    






The stock market is reaching our initial targets
              
              Plus: RCII, SNI and the lowest VIX ever. By Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

12:07 p.m. July 27, 2017







Stay bullish on U.S. stocks but be careful too
              
              Plus: PBYI and APA. By Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

3:02 p.m. July 20, 2017







Extremely low volatility could lead to a sharp, but short-lived, decline in stocks 
              
              Still, a chart of the S&P 500 reveals an undercurrent of bullishness, says Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

1:42 p.m. July 19, 2017







The S&P 500 suffers another failed breakout
              
              But this time, as opposed to mid-June, it was a failed breakout on the downside. By Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

2:09 p.m. July 13, 2017







S&P 500 is still stuck in a range, but chart looks positive
              
              Expect a clear breakout and close outside of the trading range to produce a move with some follow-through, says Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

9:54 a.m. July 6, 2017







S&P 500 support has held, as bulls hold firm
              
              The intermediate-term path for stocks remains positive but a sharp, short-lived correction remains possible, says Lawrence G. McMillan.               
              
            

1:21 p.m. June 29, 2017







Don’t get bogged down by the S&P’s overbought conditions and sell signals 
              
              Two big moves in the past week were duds. But the intermediate picture remains positive.              
              
            

9:09 a.m. June 27, 2017








        From the Trading Deck »





 MarketWatch Premium Products









MarketWatch Options Trader 
 
Lawrence G. McMillan, Editor
The ultimate guide to options trading. Get actionable ideas and unique insight about specific stocks from Lawrence G. McMillan. Also get guidance on risk management, sentiment from the trading floor, and what's coming up next for traders.
Valuable trading strategiesEasy-to-follow guidanceMaster trading psychologyGet your FREE 30-day trial today!
 
/conga/premium-newsletters/options_trader_promo.html
153838














Most Popular





1.





Market Extra

Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials






2.






All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart






3.





Market Snapshot

S&P 500, Nasdaq finish lower after Amazon disappointment; Dow closes at record






4.





MarketWatch First Take

Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’






5.





SectorWatch

Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale












Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 






Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




10:12 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15





















































Lawrence G. McMillan - MarketWatch.com Topics


























Bulletin






Investor Alert


















Topics
Lawrence G. McMillan




The S&P 500’s upside breakout is the clear signal we needed
12:27 p.m. June 6, 2017
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Declines in stock prices are now smaller and shallower, says Lawrence G. McMillan.


The month-long ‘correction’ in U.S. stocks might be over
3:30 a.m. March 29, 2017
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Buyers bullishly stepped in on Monday and Tuesday, and prevented further losses, Lawrence G. McMillan.


For the S&P 500, new buy signals abound
4:19 p.m. Nov. 10, 2016
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The technical picture in the index has changed a bit over the past week, with a number of Bollinger Band and oversold signals suggesting that the time to buy may be here.


Traders need to stop looking for a ‘magic’ catalyst to move this market
3:51 p.m. Oct. 3, 2016
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The fact remains that the SPX is trapped in another trading range — just above the trading range that had held it in check for months, if not years, prior to the post-Brexit breakout to new highs. It doesn’t really matter why this is happening.


Recent action suggests ‘sell on rallies’ time may be here
8:38 a.m. Sept. 15, 2016
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The picture has turned somewhat bearish with the SPX breaking support, and as a result, we are changing our stance to “sell on rallies.” If the support at 2120 were clearly to be broken, an even more aggressive bearish stance would be warranted.


Bulls begin to face questions about further upside
8:25 a.m. Aug. 25, 2016
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The bullish trend is still in place, but there are potential problems ahead. That said, a pullback to support isn’t necessarily a bad thing, as there are multiple levels to consider and 


Negative indicators suggest investors take a breath
4:06 p.m. May 19, 2016
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
While there are a number of indicators pointing in opposite directions with regard to this market, a few of the more ominous ones are giving us pause.


Market gives little sign this bull run will stop soon
6:09 p.m. April 20, 2016
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
While there have been some half-hearted, occasional sell signals from our indicators along the way, there has never been a confluence of sells that would indicate that this bull run is ending. 


Stock market seems vulnerable, but no sell signals have arisen
11:49 a.m. Nov. 3, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
There are no operative sell signals in the stock market at this time, so — despite the fact that SPX has risen 220 points in a month — we remain bullish


Positive indicators line up for the SPX
1:50 p.m. July 30, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
There are a number of different indicators we look at for potential tells as to the future movement of the S&P 500, most of which are flashing positive right now, with the least enthusiastic, strangely, the S&P itself.


Still waiting for a breakout in the S&P 500 index
11:48 a.m. June 23, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The “market” might be excited about the prospects over a Greek deal but the technical indicators remain blasé.


The S&P 500 hit a new high — but don’t call it a ‘breakout’
3:28 p.m. May 21, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
While these new records among the broad indexes produced much glee, problems could resurface if a breakout is not confirmed.


Sharp drop in S&P 500 futures points to nervous market
2:01 p.m. April 1, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Nothing displayed nervous stock market activity more than what happened last night with regards to the S&P 500 futures.


Technical breakdown in the S&P 500 is significant
4:03 p.m. March 6, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The S&P 500 Index had become one, large yawn-inducing slug. That is changing today — in a big way. 


Stocks are volatile but directionless
6:31 p.m. Jan. 28, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
A breakout from the current trading range in the S&P 500 Index will lead to a strong, directional move.


Mixed market signals suggest volatile trading range
5:47 p.m. Jan. 15, 2015
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Opinion: Hope you enjoyed low volatility while it lasted, because everything has changed.


2015 bullish as ‘years ending in 5’ pattern takes shape
2:33 p.m. Dec. 24, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
According to The Stock Trader’s Almanac, every year but one ending in “5” since 1885 has been bullish.


Stock-market correction imminent
5:50 p.m. Dec. 2, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index has been on a virtual tear — gaining over 250 points since the October lows.


No confirmed sell signals — but a little profit taking might be wise
4:47 p.m. Nov. 12, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Even though the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index rallied nearly 220 points in less than a month, there is still more upside potential to this stock market. 


Despite recent strength, S&P 500 is still in a downtrend
3:38 p.m. Oct. 21, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Since the latest swing is to the upside, including three very strong days since the retest of the 1,820 lows last Thursday, the bulls are feeling superior.


Record 200-day moving average due for a fall
1:32 p.m. Oct. 7, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The S&P 500 holding above its 200-day moving average for nearly two years is a record waiting to be broken, says Lawrence McMillan.


Leading indicators roll over to sell signals
5:39 p.m. Sept. 23, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The euphoria over the Alibaba public offering failed to keep market internals from turning negative, says Lawrence McMillan.


Breadth divergence is a troubling sign for the stock market
2:54 p.m. July 29, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Stock-market indicators are turning bearish — and most worrisome among this group is breadth.


Don’t short this dull market
1:51 p.m. July 16, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Many financial areas are displaying some of the lowest volatility in memory. Is this a danger sign or just part of a longer-term bullish trend? In some sense, it’s both.


Short-lived correction threatens overbought market
3:35 p.m. June 24, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Major market indicators are overbought but the market plods higher — ignoring a seasonally bearish factor in the process.


Market rally continues despite low volatility
12:32 p.m. May 29, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The broad market broke out to new  highs, extending to a strong second day — but Lawrence McMillan wonders if the upside breakout can hold.


Stocks stuck in trading range
3:18 p.m. April 30, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The market is range-bound and the indicators are split, though volatility, which is the most bullish, is generally a strong indicator, says Lawrence McMillan.


Traders frustrated by false breakouts
1:08 p.m. April 17, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Support and resistance levels are frustrating short-term traders — or anyone looking for directional momentum, says Lawrence McMillan.


Breakout suggests more upside ahead
5:12 p.m. April 2, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Two important systematic buy signals have been registered, bolstering the bullish case, says Lawrence McMillan.


Only ‘buy’ signals; upside breakout confirmed
5:23 p.m. March 4, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
A few overbought conditions could deteriorate into sell signals, but anticipating them could be injurious to one’s wealth.


Are the bears in retreat?
1:00 p.m. Jan. 28, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Completed sell signals suggest more pain but a variety of indicators point to more gain.


Monday selloff is a warning sign
2:07 p.m. Jan. 14, 2014
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The technical damage is minimal but when the real selling begins, no one wants to be the last one out of the door.


S&P 500 holds support despite daily declines
4:45 p.m. Dec. 5, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Stock market bears have been able to stem the tide, as the major market indexes have declined every day in December (so far). This may be illusory, though, unless the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index can break down through a support level. 


Bulls run to rescue the market — too late
3:56 p.m. Nov. 8, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The equity-only put-call ratios have been the lone bullish holdout amongst a gathering storm of sell signals and overbought conditions., writes Lawrence McMillan.


Indicators are still bullish — but overbought
2:54 p.m. Oct. 23, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The market’s negative tone today could lead to short-term sell signals, especially if there is another day of negative breadth tomorrow.


Eyes on the budget battle and the VIX
4:01 p.m. Oct. 8, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
It’s unlikely that the market will make a sustainable bottom without a severely oversold condition — regardless of whatever type of rally might take place when Congress and the White House finally come to some type of agreement.


The bulls are in charge of the S&P 500
6:01 a.m. Sept. 20, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
The Fed’s decision not to taper was a big sigh of relief for many traders, and the resulting buying explosion was powerful, writes Lawrence McMillan.


Don’t blame Syria for market rout
4:12 p.m. Aug. 28, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Many of the technical indicators had already turned negative before the Syrian “situation,” so to blame the current market decline on Syria is a mistake, in my opinion. Rather, it is a catalyst for increased selling, in line with what the indicators were already forecasting. 


Market bulls keep upside pressure on
2:20 p.m. Aug. 5, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Stock market bulls are keeping the upside pressure on, forcing short covering and other unwanted maneuvers from the bears’ point of view. 


Overbought market conditions are building up
4:00 p.m. July 22, 2013
					  - By Lawrence G. McMillan
		  
Overbought does not mean sell. Overbought conditions can persist for quite some time while the market works its way higher.









Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9












Topics in the news


McKenna, Francine


U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Northrop Grumman Corp.



Sales


Kilgore, Tomi


Aerospace


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange














Log In




10:12 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft








































































Volatility Trades and Explosive Shorts - Bloomberg






























































  













Facebook


Twitter


Email


Print


Share














Money Stuff
Volatility Trades and Explosive Shorts


                    Also anti-money-laundering compliance, Uber, Snap, short-termism and collateral.
                

by Matt Levine
        
@matt_levine
More stories by Matt Levine









February 17, 2017, 9:10 AM EST






Catalyst.A basic rule of volatility trading is that if you bet against volatility, you will increase volatility. So a classic way to bet against volatility would be to sell call options, and hedge them by buying the underlying stock. You might, for instance, sell an at-the-money call option on 100 shares of stock, and buy 50 shares of stock to hedge. If the stock price goes up, the price of the calls will also go up; you'll make money on the stock but lose on the calls. If the stock price goes down, the price of the calls will also go down, and again it will balance out.But if the stock price goes up, your hedge will also be less of a hedge. After all, if the options end up in the money, you will need to deliver 100 shares to the buyer, not 50. If they end up out of the money, the proper hedge will be zero shares. So if the stock price moves, you will need to adjust your hedge. If the stock goes up, you'll need to buy more shares, to hedge the increasing risk that the options will end in the money. If it goes down, you'll need to sell some of your shares. (This is called "dynamic hedging," and the Black-Scholes math that tells you how many shares to buy or sell is pretty well understood. That math also uses Greek letters. The hedge is called "delta," and the change in the hedge as the stock price moves is called "gamma.") The two things to notice here are:




You're buying when the stock goes up, and selling when it goes down. This is bad. (Normally you want to buy low and sell high.) But you have to do it, to keep your position hedged. And the more the stock moves, the more you have to rebalance your hedge -- buying high and selling low -- and the more money you lose. If the stock stays flat, you don't lose any money (and get to keep the premium that you received for selling the options in the first place). This is why selling call options is a bet against volatility.If you buy stock when the price goes up, you'll push the price up more. If you sell when the price goes down, you'll push the price down more. Your own hedge rebalancing is increasing volatility. Your bet against volatility has caused volatility to go up. You are not just a passive observer of volatility; you are also helping to create it.




Anyway people seem to be pretty excited about the Catalyst Hedged Futures Strategy Fund:It is the buzz of Wall Street: a five-day, 15% plunge in a U.S. mutual fund whose bearish bets were undone by the S&P 500’s latest run to fresh records.The Catalyst fund (here's a factsheet) was betting against volatility. Here's one explanation:The Catalyst fund’s strategy uses options on the S&P 500 index, contracts that allow investors to buy or sell at set prices over fixed time frames. In this case, the fund employed a “butterfly spread” that benefits the fund if the market remains stable, rises slightly or declines in any magnitude.But we can ignore the options bestiary and just assume that it was short call options. More technically: It was short gamma, meaning that it was in the position of our call seller above, who has to buy stock -- here, S&P 500 futures -- when the stock goes up and sell when it goes down. (Catalyst had also bought options, but its net position, at the relevant times and prices, seems to have been short gamma.) Those "options were set to expire Friday, meaning there was little time for the market to reverse and return the bet to profitability." More importantly, it means they had a lot of gamma: If it's Wednesday, and you are short an at-the-money option on 100 shares that expires on Friday, then you are going to have to come up with either 100 shares or zero shares by Friday. If the stock ticks up just a little bit, you'll have to buy a lot; if it ticks down just a little bit, you'll have to sell a lot. You can see Catalyst's problem, as the S&P crept up on Tuesday and Wednesday.




But Catalyst's big bet against volatility also may have added to the volatility:Theories abounded Wednesday and Thursday that forced covering by Catalyst was doing everything from boosting stocks to pushing up the Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility Index, also known as the VIX. Some of the speculation focused on unusual market happenings, like when the VIX jumped as stocks rallied yesterday, a relatively rare concerted move.“There may have been some market impact from our trading earlier this week, but it’s certainly not the majority of the market impact, by any stretch,” said Szilagyi.People seem to want absolutes in this story. Did Catalyst cause the market moves? (It's right there in the name! Surely it was a catalyst?) "Our exposure was greatly exaggerated, and our impact on the market was greatly exaggerated," said Catalyst Capital Advisors LLC Chief Executive Officer Jerry Szilagyi. "I’m hard pressed to imagine that a $4 billion fund is moving the entire market," said Edward Walczak, the fund's manager. On one level, I'm sure that's right. On another level, buying is what makes prices go up. It is the nature of volatility trading that they probably had some impact. 




Or: Was Catalyst "forced" to cover its positions? Szilagyi said: "Comments that we were forced to short cover are not correct. We haven’t been forced to do anything." But if you are short gamma going into an expiry, and the stock is going up, the Black-Scholes formula will "force" you to buy stock. (Or get rid of some of your positions, instead.) Not literally. You can ignore it. But if you are a hedged volatility trader, the Black-Scholes math is going to feel like at least a pretty strong suggestion.I don't have any reason to think that anything weird was going on at Catalyst, any forced trading that would move the market. But probably something normal was going on at Catalyst: It was a hedged option seller, had to adjust its hedge, and in doing so probably had an effect on the market.Don't do this.Umm, so:According to the affidavit supporting the criminal complaint, Barnett offered a confidential source (CS) $10,000 to place improvised explosive bombs in Target retail stores along the east coast of the United States. Barnett created at least 10 of the explosive devices, disguised in food-item packaging, which Barnett delivered to the CS on February 9, 2017. Barnett then asked the CS to place the explosive devices on store shelves from New York to Florida. He also provided the CS with a bag of gloves, a mask, and a license plate cover to disguise the CS’s identity from law enforcement.Barnett theorized that the company’s stock value would plunge after the explosions, allowing him to cheaply acquire shares of Target stock before an eventual rebound in prices.I feel like someone needs to go to his jail cell and explain short selling to him. I mean, also lots of other things. But the way to profit from stock prices going down is by shorting the stock, and then covering when the prices go down. That's the trade here! But his (alleged) plan -- not shorting, but waiting until after the explosions and then buying -- makes no sense. What if he blows up some Targets, and the price drops, and he buys stock, and then some other idiot blows up some more Targets, and the price keeps dropping? The future is always uncertain. If you are going to insider trade, or whatever this is, you want your trade to exactly reflect the thing you have the most control over, where you actually have information that no one else has. Here, sure, blowing up some Targets will probably push the stock down, so you want to be short the stock heading into the bombings.It goes without saying that none of this is any sort of advice.We talk sometimes around here about the first two Laws of Insider Trading, which are (1) don't insider trade and (2) certainly don't insider trade by buying short-dated out-of-the-money call options on merger targets. I have never thought it necessary to formulate a law like "don't insider trade by planting bombs in a store so you can short the company's stock." But definitely don't do that. That is every kind of advice. We also sometimes talk around here about how all law is securities law, how securities regulators expand their jurisdiction to regulate sexual harassment and global warming and whatever other issues they care about. But securities law is, in the grand scheme of things, not that big a deal. You don't want to get caught insider trading. But you really, really, really don't want to get caught planting bombs in Targets. Come on.AML.The U.S. Federal Bureau of Investigation, various intelligence agencies and various Congressional committees are investigating whether there are any suspicious connections between Donald Trump and Russia. But so, apparently, is someone else: Deutsche Bank AG.The scandal-hit bank that loaned hundreds of millions of dollars to Donald Trump has conducted a close internal examination of the US president’s personal account to gauge whether there are any suspicious connections to Russia, the Guardian has learned.Wouldn't it be funny if Deutsche Bank found things that the FBI, the CIA, the NSA and Congress didn't? And why not? The thing to keep in mind here is that if you are a large international bank, your most important business is U.S. anti-money-laundering compliance. I doubt that BNP Paribas has done too many trades that are bigger than its $8.9 billion fine for violating U.S. sanctions. HSBC paid $1.9 billion. Commerzbank paid $1.45 billion. There are lots more, suspiciously concentrated among non-U.S. banks. Deutsche Bank itself paid $258 million for sanctions violations in 2015, and then paid $630 million just last month for ... facilitating suspicious trades in Russia.Deutsche Bank has all the right incentives to catch suspicious trades in Russia. If Deutsche Bank is smart, it is hiring the very best people in the world at ferreting out suspicious Russian transactions, and paying them millions of dollars, with performance bonuses for catching anything untoward. How can the FBI or the CIA compete with that? In a sense, the last few years of U.S. anti-money-laundering enforcement have effectively privatized the business of catching foreign financial corruption. If you're an expert at finding corrupt transactions, why would you work at the FBI? The place to ply your trade is clearly at a big bank. Oh by the way that might all go away:America's largest banks are to propose a complete overhaul of how financial institutions investigate and report potential criminal activity, arguing that rules imposed in the years after the Sept. 11, 2001 attacks and strengthened during the Obama administration are onerous and ineffective, sources said.People are worried about unicorns.I'm a little worried about one unicorny point in yesterday's Money Stuff that needs to be expanded a bit. We  talked about Uber Technologies Inc., which is buying stock from employees at prices well below where it sells stock to investors. "Uber is, as it were, getting paid the bid-ask spread," I said, and I think that is a true and useful explanation of what's going on. But several readers pointed out: Uber is also buying and selling different things. It's buying common stock from employees, but it's selling preferred stock -- with liquidation preferences and more rights -- to outside investors. The investors should pay more. The difference is not entirely an arbitrage.Elsewhere in unicorns, Snap Inc. co-founder Evan Spiegel "is set to receive about 36.8 million restricted shares in the company" at the close of its initial public offering, "equal to about 3 percent of its outstanding stock." That's a lot of stock ($588 million worth, at the high end of the IPO pricing range). I don't entirely understand the point of giving a founder restricted equity awards? Like, he already owns a ton of stock (more than $3.4 billion worth). He effectively controls half the company. "The award was granted in July 2015 to motivate Spiegel 'to continue growing our business and improving financial results'"; was he not motivated before? There is an arcane theological feel to many executive compensation discussions, which only make sense if you already have faith. Maybe if I owned $3.4 billion worth of stock in a company that I had founded, my attention might wander, and I might stop caring about growing the business. But then the promise of another half-billion dollars of stock might bring back my focus. It is not impossible? I have no relevant experience by which to evaluate that claim. It does seem odd.Also this is a little weird?Snap is reserving 14 million shares, or 7% of its offering, for friends and family of its executives. The company says those may include existing investors but won’t include employees. The friends-and-family allotment could give the impression that buddies of Snap’s 26-year-old Chief Executive Evan Spiegel will be laying claim to a sizable portion of the available shares. They could be long-term investors, or they could be getting the generous gift of the IPO pop.Elsewhere: "Theranos Had $200 Million in Cash Left at Year-End." Would you have guessed higher or lower?People are worried about stock buybacks.Here is Larry Summers on short-termism:Some companies have great ideas, great management teams, and compelling strategies. They invest heavily, seek to grow revenue, ignore the management of earnings, and do limited stock buybacks. These are the criteria McKinsey uses to measure long-termism. Other companies lack vision and have mediocre management. They invest less, cut costs more, manage earnings, and buy back their stock. McKinsey deems them short term–focused.No surprise, the long-term companies outperform the short-term companies. But this may be due to their vision and execution capacity, not their long-term focus. That is: "Short-termism" (spending money on buybacks rather than growth) may be a perfectly appropriate response to a lack of opportunities, or a lack of ability to execute on them. Companies with mediocre managers and not too many opportunities that invested their money in "growth" would just waste the money (and enrich the managers). Good governance properly demands that those companies give the money back to shareholders, who can put it somewhere useful. The short-termism is -- arguably -- a symptom, not a cause.Elsewhere, the Roosevelt Institute is worried that a corporate tax cut will just be wasted on stock buybacks:American businesses already enjoy a historically low cost of capital, and they have more than enough cash on hand to invest, raise wages, and create jobs. Corporations are choosing to make dividend payments and stock buybacks instead of investing because they face a lack of competitive pressure—itself the result of power and wealth shifting toward rich shareholders. Another tax cut for the rich will only make the problem worse.People are worried about bond market liquidity.I'll count worries about collateral as a subset of bond market liquidity worries:The world is running out of safe financial assets. One reason may be regulators’ push to make trading safer.A scarcity of safe collateral can create bouts of volatility in the markets where investors fund their purchases.The problem is that clearinghouses have to collect margin and invest it somewhere safe, and as more derivatives trading moves to clearinghouses, there'll be more collateral demand from them. This seems like ... less a new problem, and more just a problem that moved from somewhere else? After all, when derivatives traded bilaterally, the banks collected margin and had to keep it somewhere safe. Broadly, though, they collected less margin and kept it somewhere less safe. The question, as so often, is: Were the banks' economic decisions about margining and collateral better or worse than regulators' decisions?Things happen.







                        A daily take on Wall Street, finance, companies and stuff.
                    

                        Matt Levine's Money Stuff
                    





                                    Sign Up
                            










At Cerberus, Feinberg Built a Web of National Security Ties. Hurdles Mount for Saudi Aramco’s IPO. Public Finance Authority shakes up muni market with help from ‘public good’ evolution. Fidelity Investments Reports Record Revenue in 2016. Mark Zuckerberg has a new mission statement. Samsung Heir Jay Y. Lee Is Arrested on Bribery Allegations. Norway Central Bank Chief Warns of ‘Sharp’ Drop in Wealth Fund. One of Government’s Largest Landlords, Vornado, Pays Millions Each Year to Trump Company. ‘In Trump We Trust’ Is Market Mantra as Turmoil Besets White House. A Little Birdie Told Me: Playing the Market on Trump Tweets. Mnuchin Warned by Japan, Germany as G-20 Sees New Economic Order. Embattled CFPB Gets a Legal Reprieve. What lettuces tell us about deregulating Britain. Hunter Harrison ‘Disappointed’ CSX Board, Activist Partner Unable to Reach Settlement. Ex-Citigroup Banker Taps Global Talent to Revive India Bank. Explanations for cost disease. Spain looks to overhaul long workday culture. The Beautiful TI-108. Salt bae. 13 pounds of horse genitals concealed in woman's luggage; claimed it was for medicinal purposes.If you'd like to get Money Stuff in handy e-mail form, right in your inbox, please subscribe at this link. Thanks! 
This column does not necessarily reflect the opinion of the editorial board or Bloomberg LP and its owners.
To contact the author of this story:          Matt Levine     at mlevine51@bloomberg.netTo contact the editor responsible for this story:          James Greiff      at jgreiff@bloomberg.net



Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.

LEARN MORE





            Comments
        










            Matt Levine is a Bloomberg View columnist. He was an editor of Dealbreaker, an investment banker at Goldman Sachs, a mergers and acquisitions lawyer at Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz and a clerk for the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit. 
        

            Read more
        

            Follow @matt_levine on Twitter
        








Most Read




Scaramucci's Rant Should Terrify Trump Voters
by Ramesh Ponnuru





Trump's Twitter Habit Destabilizes the World
by Editorial Board





Trump's Cultural Revolution
by Francis Wilkinson





Sharif's Ouster Is Bad News
by Mihir Sharma





4 Reasons for Nascar's Big Skid
by Justin Fox





Trump's Dishonorable Transgender Ban
by Michael R. Bloomberg





Trump Says Apple Will Build Three U.S. Plants. It Won't.
by Shira Ovide






















































New volatility products make good hedges - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,830
+33.76
+0.15%






Nasdaq

6,375
-7.51
-0.12%






S&P 500

2,472
-3.32
-0.13%









9:15 P.M. ET


Updated
      Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
                                





 
7:38 P.M. ET


                                  Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
                                





 
7:28 P.M. ET


                                  A Wild Week in Washington 
                                





 
6:32 P.M. ET


Updated
      The dark side of cruises
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


                                   Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


Updated
      The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


Updated
      O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
                                





 
6:30 P.M. ET


Updated
      Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
                                





 
6:29 P.M. ET


Updated
      Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
                                





 
6:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
                                





 
6:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
                                





 
6:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
                                





 
6:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      Americans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
                                





 
6:26 P.M. ET


Updated
      5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
                                





 
6:14 P.M. ET


Updated
      Beyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
                                





 
6:13 P.M. ET


Updated
      These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
                                





 
6:11 P.M. ET


Updated
      Watch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
                                





 
6:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
                                





 
6:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      ‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
                                





 
6:08 P.M. ET


Updated
      This basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Investing







Options







Lawrence G. McMillan




Get email alerts



         New volatility products make good hedges
    








    By
        
        Lawrence G. McMillan 

Published: Apr 4, 2011 12:01 a.m. ET

Share






















































 



 


        Commentary: Everyone is looking for a piece of the volatility pie
    



















By

                                        LawrenceG. McMillan 







MORRISTOWN, N.J. (MarketWatch) — Several new volatility products have recently entered the market or will soon be listed for trading. The most promising of these is the new set of contracts to be listed on the Chicago Board Options Exchange. Trading began on March 25 in Gold Volatility Index futures on the CBOE. Options on them will be listed on April 12. Many other new products will follow in due course. CBOE’s new volatility products: The CBOE is going to start trading options on a whole new set of stocks and exchange-traded funds, plus create more volatility indexes. This is welcome news to anyone who views volatility as a “friend.” Personally, I feel that a long position in anything (stocks, futures, ETFs, etc.) can be better hedged by owning volatility, in the form of volatility calls than it can be by buying puts or selling covered calls.





		TRADING STRATEGIES: MARCH

		Trouble ahead?
		Japan's crisis, turmoil in Europe and unrest in the Middle East have 
		investors worried that we’ll all be thrown back into the throes of global recession.

•
		

            
		Hulbert: Seasonal trading patterns battle

		•
		

            
		Willard: Long apps, short the Fed

		•
		

            
		Kahn: Dollar remains crippled

		•
		

            
		Helfert: Expect the unexpected

		•
		

            
		Morales/Kacher: Buy silver to hedge

		•
		

            
		Kee: Sell anything vulnerable to a downturn

		•
		

            
		Sizemore: Three low-risk ETFs for spring

		•
		

            
		Hulbert: In search of higher yields

		•
		

            
		McMillan: New volatility product hedges

		•


            Global turmoil calls for hedging with oil

		•
		

            
		Fitz-Gerald: Three stocks to buy, no matter what

		•
		

            
		Lowell: Safer havens amid global calamity

		• 

        
            
		
		• 
		

        
            
		
• 

        
             
		


The volatility, or VIX, calculation is merely a formula that can be applied to the set of options on anything — as long as there are continuous markets being made in the options. The traditional VIX 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    VIX, +1.78%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         is based on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    SPX, -0.13%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         options and will probably eventually come to be known as the “SPX VIX.”  You may already know that the CBOE has been publishing a VIX calculation on several stocks and commodities for some time. For example, there is an “Oil VIX” 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    OVX, +0.17%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         “Gold VIX” 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    GVZ, +1.78%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         and “Euro FX VIX” 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    EVZ, -3.81%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         These are based on the options on the United State Oil Fund 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    USO, +1.09%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         SPDR Gold Trust 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    GLD, +0.75%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         and Euro Shares 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    FXE, +0.73%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         ETFs, respectively. Also there are new VIX-like calculations on the stocks Apple Inc. 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    AAPL, -0.70%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (AAPL), Amazon.com Inc. 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    AMZN, -2.48%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         , Goldman Sachs Groups Inc. 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    GS, +0.96%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         Google Inc. 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    GOOG, +0.80%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         and IBM 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    IBM, -0.54%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         The respective symbols for the volatility calculations on these six products are VXAPL, XVAZN, VXGS, VXGOG, VXIBM, and VXOVX.  The CBOE has applied to trade options on all of these VIX-like calculations, and — if approved — there will be volatility futures on them as well. In addition, the CBOE is going to start disseminating VIX computations for the iShares MSCI Emerging Markets Index ETF 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    EEM, -0.05%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (“VIX” symbol: VXEEM); iShares FTSE/Xinhua China 25 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    FXI, +0.12%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (VXFXI); iShares MSCI Brazil 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    EWZ, +0.73%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (VXEWZ); Market Vectors Gold Miners 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    GDX, +1.51%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (VXGDX); iShares Silver Trust 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    SLV, +0.83%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (VXSLV); and Energy Select Sector SPDR 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    XLE, -0.12%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         (VXXLE). Obviously, the CBOE will look to list options and futures on these at some time in the future. I have long predicted that somewhere in the future, when a new stock or ETF has options listed, there will be put options, call options, and volatility options (and futures). This is the beginning of that statement coming true. CME volatility futures and options Everyone is trying to get a piece of the “volatility pie,” it seems. Of course, the leader in volatility trading is still the CBOE and its futures exchange, the CFE – where the VIX futures and options trade.  As we’ve detailed these various products over the years and months, we also know that iPath S&P 500 VIX Short-Term Futures 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    VXX, +1.07%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         and iPath S&P 500 VIX Mid-Term Futures 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    VXZ, -0.14%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         Barclay’s exchange-traded notes, or ETNs, are popular as well and have active listed options. Other exchanges have yet to figure out a way to provide liquidity for their various products. There was a lot of fanfare for the CME-listed volatility futures on gold and crude oil. Trading, though, has been woeful in these contracts.  Even after being listed for two months, there is a total open interest of zero in gold and no open interest at all in the crude oil volatility futures either. Moreover, I know for a fact that traders have tried to get markets out of the pit and basically the contracts are untradable. Why even bother? VolX and realized euro futures Now, there are realized volatility contracts listed on the CME, in the euro. These contracts were designed by an independent company, The Volatility Exchange, or VolX, which publishes realized volatility indexes on 11 different markets (two currencies, three equity indexes, three commodities, and three interest rates). These 11 VolX indexes cannot be traded (except for the euro listing). The symbol for the realized euro volatility contracts on the CME is 16E. There are currently March, April, and May futures expiring this year (16E H1, 16E J1, and 16E K1). Trading volume and open interest is low, but they are at least trying to get some activity going.  I wish them success, but one wonders why the lessons that the CBOE has learned are not being taken to heart by these futures exchanges. CBOE variance contracts have been woeful (although way more active than anything the CME has listed so far). All of the public demand is in implied volatility. So why list a realized volatility contract? CBOE Volatility SKEW Index The CBOE is now publishing a Skew Index. This is similar to VIX, except that it only measures the deeply out of the money contracts – at the tail end of the distribution. Most of the time SKEW trades at a higher price than VIX, but it didn’t in the “crash” of 2008 (somewhat strange). The index is being calculated and published only once per day (at the close). There are no actual products that trade. 


More from MarketWatch






















Quote References


VIX

+0.18
+1.78%



SPX

-3.32
-0.13%



OVX

+0.05
+0.17%



GVZ

+0.20
+1.78%





EVZ

-0.31
-3.81%



USO

+0.11
+1.09%



GLD

+0.90
+0.75%



FXE

+0.82
+0.73%



AAPL

-1.06
-0.70%



AMZN

-25.96
-2.48%



GS

+2.13
+0.96%



GOOG

+7.44
+0.80%



IBM

-0.78
-0.54%



EEM

-0.02
-0.05%



FXI

+0.05
+0.12%



EWZ

+0.27
+0.73%



GDX

+0.34
+1.51%



SLV

+0.13
+0.83%



XLE

-0.08
-0.12%



VXX

+0.12
+1.07%



VXZ

-0.03
-0.14%



Show all references


Most Popular





Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials





All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart





S&P 500, Nasdaq finish lower after Amazon disappointment; Dow closes at record





Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’





Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale



Data Provided By

Today's Interest Rates


Mortgage
Equity
Savings
Auto
Credit Cards





30 yr fixed Jumbo
4.1%


30 yr fixed
3.85%


15 yr fixed
3.02%


10 yr fixed
2.91%


30 yr fixed refi
3.83%


15 yr fixed refi
3%


5/1 ARM
3.12%


5/1 ARM refi
3.25%


National averages from Bankrate.com




$30K HELOC
5.11%


$50K HELOC
4.96%


$75K HELOC
4.98%


$100K HELOC
4.78%


$30K Home Equity Loan
5.2%


$50K Home Equity Loan
4.67%


$75K Home Equity Loan
4.65%


$100K Home Equity Loan
4.9%


National averages from Bankrate.com




5 yr CD
1.26%


2 yr CD
0.87%


1 yr CD
0.74%


MMA $10K+
0.32%


MMA $50K+
0.4%


MMA Savings
0.26%


MMA Savings Jumbo
0.42%


National averages from Bankrate.com




60 Mo Used Car
3.07%


48 Mo Used Car
3.01%


36 Mo Used Car
3.16%


72 Mo New Car
3.11%


60 Mo New Car
3.24%


48 Mo New Car
3%


60 Mo Auto Refi
2.97%


36 Mo Auto Refi
2.5%


National averages from Bankrate.com






Avg. APR
Last Week
6 Months




Low Interest
12.84%
12.83%
12.22%


Business
13.68%
13.68%
13.41%


Balance Transfer
15.34%
15.34%
14.67%


Student
15.64%
15.14%
13.67%


Airline
16.06%
16.06%
15.40%


Reward
16.20%
16.14%
15.48%


Cash Back
16.34%
16.21%
15.57%


Instant Approval
18.55%
18.53%
18.03%


Bad Credit
23.46%
23.43%
22.98%



Source: CreditCards.com




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found




























CBOE Volatility Index
MDX CBOE IND: VIX




10.29

+0.18
(+1.78%)








Volume0
Open10.62
High11.30
Low10.26
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













S&P 500 Index
S&P Base CME: SPX




2,472.10

-3.32
(-0.13%)








Volume2.0B
Open2,469
High2,474
Low2,465
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













CBOE Crude Oil Volatility Index
MDX CBOE IND: OVX




29.86

+0.05
(+0.17%)








Volume0
Open29.81
High30.74
Low29.75
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













CBOE Gold Volatility Index
MDX CBOE IND: GVZ




11.44

+0.20
(+1.78%)








Volume0
Open11.24
High11.67
Low11.14
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













CBOE Eurocurrency Volatility Index
MDX CBOE IND: EVZ




7.82

-0.31
(-3.81%)








Volume0
Open8.13
High8.32
Low7.75
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













United States Oil Fund LP
U.S.: NYSE Arca: USO




$10.17

+0.11
(+1.09%)








Volume31.6M
Open$10.09
High$10.20
Low$10.08
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













SPDR Gold Shares
U.S.: NYSE Arca: GLD




$120.69

+0.90
(+0.75%)








Volume6.6M
Open$120.15
High$120.86
Low$120.14
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













CurrencyShares Euro Trust
U.S.: NYSE Arca: FXE




$113.69

+0.82
(+0.73%)








Volume738.1K
Open$113.37
High$113.72
Low$113.33
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













Apple Inc.
U.S.: Nasdaq: AAPL




$149.50

-1.06
(-0.70%)








Volume16.5M
Open$149.89
High$150.23
Low$149.19
P/E Ratio17.49
Div Yield1.69
Market Cap785.0B













Amazon.com Inc.
U.S.: Nasdaq: AMZN




$1,020.04

-25.96
(-2.48%)








Volume7.6M
Open$1,012
High$1,033
Low$1,001
P/E Ratio258.89
Div Yield0
Market Cap500.0B













Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
U.S.: NYSE: GS




$223.61

+2.13
(+0.96%)








Volume2.5M
Open$221.77
High$223.67
Low$220.86
P/E Ratio11.73
Div Yield1.34
Market Cap87.2B













Alphabet Inc. Cl C
U.S.: Nasdaq: GOOG




$941.53

+7.44
(+0.80%)








Volume1.7M
Open$929.40
High$943.83
Low$927.50
P/E Ratio34.11
Div Yield0
Market Cap652.9B













International Business Machines Corp.
U.S.: NYSE: IBM




$144.29

-0.78
(-0.54%)








Volume2.9M
Open$144.81
High$145.04
Low$143.84
P/E Ratio11.99
Div Yield4.16
Market Cap135.2B













iShares MSCI Emerging Markets ETF
U.S.: NYSE Arca: EEM




$43.75

-0.02
(-0.05%)








Volume45.6M
Open$43.61
High$43.76
Low$43.50
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0.88
Market CapN/A













iShares China Large-Cap ETF
U.S.: NYSE Arca: FXI




$42.42

+0.05
(+0.12%)








Volume10.4M
Open$42.29
High$42.43
Low$42.19
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield2.01
Market CapN/A













iShares MSCI Brazil Capped ETF
U.S.: NYSE Arca: EWZ




$37.39

+0.27
(+0.73%)








Volume10.9M
Open$37.10
High$37.44
Low$36.97
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield1.48
Market CapN/A













VanEck Vectors Gold Miners ETF
U.S.: NYSE Arca: GDX




$22.91

+0.34
(+1.51%)








Volume35.2M
Open$22.68
High$22.94
Low$22.61
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0.24
Market CapN/A













iShares Silver Trust
U.S.: NYSE Arca: SLV




$15.81

+0.13
(+0.83%)








Volume5.8M
Open$15.76
High$15.84
Low$15.74
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













Energy Select Sector SPDR ETF
U.S.: NYSE Arca: XLE




$66.47

-0.08
(-0.12%)








Volume14.0M
Open$66.33
High$67.13
Low$66.22
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield2.7
Market CapN/A













Barclays Bank PLC iPath S&P 500 VIX Short-Term Futures ETN
U.S.: NYSE Arca: VXX




$11.29

+0.12
(+1.07%)








Volume61.9M
Open$11.41
High$11.58
Low$11.25
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A













Barclays Bank PLC iPath S&P 500 VIX Mid-Term Futures ETN
U.S.: NYSE Arca: VXZ




$21.00

-0.03
(-0.14%)








Volume139.9K
Open$21.02
High$21.11
Low$20.93
P/E Ratio0
Div Yield0
Market CapN/A
























 




















































































Low Volatility and the Risks of Crowded Trades - Bloomberg






























































  













Facebook


Twitter


Email


Print


Share














Prophets
Low Volatility and the Risks of Crowded Trades


                    Investors need to appreciate the disconnect that can emerge between the price of risk in the market and the actual risks.
                

by Dean Curnutt
        
More stories by Dean Curnutt









May 2, 2017, 7:00 AM EDT













Financial market insurance is not like hurricane insurance.





Amid an improbable level of calm in markets, it’s worth remembering what Victor Haghani, a partner at Long-Term Capital Management, said in early 1999 about the fund’s implosion, especially given that quiet markets are compelling trading strategies that capitalize on low levels of volatility.The hurricane is not more or less likely to hit because more hurricane insurance has been written. In the financial markets this is not true. The more people write financial insurance, the more likely it is that a disaster will happen, because the people who know you have sold the insurance can make it happen. So you have to monitor what other people are doing.While Haghani’s statements were focused on the manner in which LTCM-specific trades were seemingly attacked by the market, they remain highly relevant today because the notion that financial market insurance is not like hurricane insurance is broadly applicable. When trades are especially crowded, their unwinding can amplify market moves as investors seek to de-risk in unison. Stable markets not only invite trades that bet on the continuation of stability, they almost force investors to pursue them in an investment climate so deprived of nominal return.Over the most recent six-month period, the realized volatility of the S&P 500 has been lower than at any time since before the financial crisis. Importantly, this period of market tranquility has generated huge profits for trading strategies that capitalize on stability by selling options. While there is an almost limitless supply of industry analysis on the current low level of the CBOE Volatility Index, or VIX, the real story has been the consistency with which the  index has overstated the actual movement in the market. How low has volatility been? Over the last six months, more than half of the days have had a less than 25 basis-point return. These are “home run” results for option sellers.




Even as markets appear stable, we should appreciate the risks. While Mother Nature dictates the timing and severity of the next hurricane, the financial market equivalent may arise endogenously, propelled by the forceful unwind of trades that enjoyed too much success for too long. Winning trades attract money, and as capital flows in to them, they become increasingly crowded. In markets, positioning matters. The Nomura Equity Volatility Risk Premium Fund, which systematically sells equity index variance swaps, has enjoyed quite a run. Since the U.S. election, it has lost money on just 27 percent of trading days. The average loss on such days has been a mere 19 basis points. The six month Sharpe Ratio of the strategy is north of 6. Strategies that make money nearly all the time, and only lose fractionally on the days they don’t are beyond appealing to investors.The standard disclaimer “past performance is no guarantee of future results” tends to be ignored when strategies generate consistent profits with seemingly low risk. This is especially the case in a world bereft of interest income and as the expected future return prospects for the traditional 60/40 stock/bond portfolio appear unconvincing. With both stock and bond valuations at stretched levels, investors are being forced into “alternative risk premia” like the one offered by the Nomura fund. While the unprecedented market swings during the financial crisis imposed massive drawdowns on short volatility strategies, handsome profits have since been generated betting against a repeat of that market chaos. Over long periods of time, there are few trades that hold up  as well as selling equity volatility. Faced with the daunting task of achieving 8 percent return targets, many pension funds have “bought the back-test” and are actively generating returns through short option strategies.Ten years after the early onset of the financial crisis, investors must appreciate the disconnect that can emerge between the price of risk in the market and the actual risks that may be in the process of materializing. In early 2007, the VIX dipped below 10, pulled down then -- like now -- by 6 percent realized volatility. Then, even as short volatility strategies profited from the very muted daily fluctuations in the S&P 500 Index, a tidal wave of systemic risk was already in motion. Over the first quarter of 2007, the mortgage industry began its collapse with a series of bankruptcies by subprime lenders. The severity of what would unfold over the next two years resulted from the one-sided positioning in the market that had built up over years based on faulty assumptions relating to credit risk and housing price appreciation.







                        Professionals offering actionable insights on markets, the economy and monetary policy.
                    

                        A roundup connecting the dots in global markets.
                    





                                    Sign Up
                            










It is easy to argue that today’s financial system is safer than that of the pre-crisis era. Wall Street banks run with considerably less leverage than they did a decade ago. Further, the speculative excess in housing and the shadow bank securitization built around it is not nearly as prominent. These differences acknowledged, the current period and that of a decade earlier are similar in sharing a protracted decline in realized volatility. In one of the most ironic set of comments ever made by a policy maker, Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan said at the 2005 Jackson Hole confab -- with the VIX at 13, realized volatility at 8 and the CDX investment grade index at 50 -- that history “has not dealt kindly with the aftermath of protracted periods of low risk premiums.” Investors should heed those words.




Bloomberg Prophets          Professionals offering actionable insights on markets, the economy and monetary policy. Contributors may have a stake in the areas they write about.      
To contact the author of this story:          Dean Curnutt     at dcurnutt3@bloomberg.netTo contact the editor responsible for this story:          Robert Burgess     at bburgess@bloomberg.net



Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.

LEARN MORE





            Comments
        






                Bloomberg Prophets
            

                Professionals offering actionable insights on markets, the economy and monetary policy.
            




            Dean Curnutt is the CEO of Macro Risk Advisors, a firm that provides global market risk analysis and execution for institutional investors. He was formerly managing director and head of equity sales-trading at Banc of America Securities.
        

            Read more
        








Most Read




Scaramucci's Rant Should Terrify Trump Voters
by Ramesh Ponnuru





Trump's Twitter Habit Destabilizes the World
by Editorial Board





Trump's Cultural Revolution
by Francis Wilkinson





Sharif's Ouster Is Bad News
by Mihir Sharma





4 Reasons for Nascar's Big Skid
by Justin Fox





Trump's Dishonorable Transgender Ban
by Michael R. Bloomberg





Trump Says Apple Will Build Three U.S. Plants. It Won't.
by Shira Ovide























































Investing News - Investment Articles - Investing Research

























Bulletin






Investor Alert























  
      Investing
    





Mutual Funds »








How Venezuela chaos could spark oil rally OPEC has failed to achieve 
              
              Political and economic turmoil in Venezuela could fuel a rise in oil prices—something the Organization of the Petroleum Exporting Countries, despite it’s efforts to cut back production, hasn’t been able to do.              
              
            

12:40 p.m.  Today12:40 p.m. July 28, 2017






What a constant stream of oil company spending cuts means for crude prices
              
              Oil companies are sounding a recurring theme: lower exploration and production spending estimates. Will that lead to a rally in oil prices?              
              
            

5:47 p.m. July 27, 2017






Put your money where your mindset is
              
              Socially conscious mutual funds invest in ways that can be good for society and your portfolio.              
              
            

1:35 p.m. July 27, 2017










Most popular funds ›


Fidelity Contra /quotes/zigman/226510/realtime
118.79
0.00
0.00%


Vanguard 500 Idx /quotes/zigman/245160/realtime
228.49
-0.30
-0.13%


CGM Tr Focus /quotes/zigman/188272/realtime
49.32
+0.29
+0.59%


Dodge Cox Stock /quotes/zigman/224556/realtime
195.60
+0.24
+0.12%


Fairholme /quotes/zigman/265845/realtime
20.12
-0.36
-1.76%


T. Rowe Price Eq Inc /quotes/zigman/240035/realtime
33.46
-0.07
-0.21%


USAA Metals Min /quotes/zigman/244622/realtime
12.98
+0.17
+1.33%








Exchange Traded Funds »








A Leveraged ETF To Consider In August
              
              A Leveraged ETF To Consider In August              
              
            

10:59 a.m.  Today10:59 a.m. July 28, 2017
(Benzinga.com)












SPY



							7/28/2017 8:00pm
					



SPDR S&P 500 ETF Trust


/quotes/zigman/714403/composite

246.91


-0.29
-0.12%













Exchange traded funds ›


PowerShares QQQ /quotes/zigman/105934/composite
143.84
-0.12
-0.08%


iShares Russell 2000 /quotes/zigman/260873/composite
141.96
-0.38
-0.27%


Financial Sector SPDR /quotes/zigman/246222/composite
24.91
0.00
0.00%


Energy Sector SPDR /quotes/zigman/246199/composite
66.47
-0.08
-0.12%


iShares MSCI Em Mkt /quotes/zigman/322623/composite
43.75
-0.02
-0.05%







/conga/native_unit.html
370720





Stocks »







/conga/investing/stocks/main.html
1293






Beyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
              
              Look at these component manufacturers rather than the car companies, says Jeff Reeves.              
              
            

6:14 p.m.  Today6:14 p.m. July 28, 2017






These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
              
              It wasn’t Trump’s “movement” that lifted stocks late last year, says Jeff Reeves. It was the promise of lower corporate tax rates.               
              
            

6:13 p.m.  Today6:13 p.m. July 28, 2017










Most popular stocks  ›


BAC /quotes/zigman/190927/composite
24.03
-0.08
-0.33%


C /quotes/zigman/5065548/composite
67.43
-0.17
-0.25%


MSFT /quotes/zigman/20493/composite
73.04
-0.12
-0.16%


INTC /quotes/zigman/20392/composite
35.31
+0.34
+0.97%


CSCO /quotes/zigman/20039/composite
31.52
-0.05
-0.16%


F /quotes/zigman/264304/composite
11.17
-0.01
-0.09%


WFC /quotes/zigman/239557/composite
53.30
-1.41
-2.58%


JPM /quotes/zigman/272085/composite
91.28
-0.27
-0.29%








Bonds »








Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
              
              The U.S. stock market is on such a parabolic march higher that Wall Street investors may have forgotten what a typical daily downturn feels like anymore.              
              
            

57 min ago9:15 p.m. July 28, 2017






S&P 500, Nasdaq Fall for the Week on Pressure From Tech Sector
              
              The Dow Jones Industrial Average posted a gain for the day and the week, while a fall in technology shares contributed to declines in the S&P 500 and Nasdaq Composite.              
              
            

9:02 p.m.  Today9:02 p.m. July 28, 2017












BX:TMUBMUSD03M



							7/28/2017 4:49pm
					



U.S. 3 Month Treasury Bill


/quotes/zigman/15866657/realtime

1.08


-0.03
-2.32%













Bonds ›


6 mo Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866663/realtime
1.13
-0.0078
-0.68%


2 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866656/realtime
1.35
-0.02
-1.16%


5 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866662/realtime
1.84
-0.01
-0.62%


10 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866666/realtime
2.29
-0.02
-0.89%


30 yr Treasury /quotes/zigman/15866668/realtime
2.90
-0.02
-0.80%








Options »





				OPTIONS SCREENER |
				
				EXPIRATIONS |
				
				OPTIONS CHAINS |
				
				GETTING STARTED
/conga/mininav/investing-options.html
2543








Extremely low volatility could lead to a sharp, but short-lived, decline in stocks 
              
              Still, a chart of the S&P 500 reveals an undercurrent of bullishness, says Lawrence G. McMillan.              
              
            

1:42 p.m. July 19, 2017






Who trades options the most? Millennial investors
              
              Millennials are frequently criticized by market experts for the way they invest—or, more accurately, the way they’re not investing—but recent research indicates that at least some young market participants are going about things in a more sophisticated way than they’re typically given credit for.              
              
            

1:32 p.m. May 24, 2017












VIX



							7/28/2017 3:14pm
					



CBOE Volatility Index


/quotes/zigman/2766221/delayed

10.29


+0.18
+1.78%













Options ›


SPX /quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10
-3.32
-0.13%


DJIA /quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31
+33.76
+0.15%


COMP /quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68
-7.51
-0.12%


RUT /quotes/zigman/2759624/delayed
1,429.26
-4.36
-0.30%


MID /quotes/zigman/6015543/delayed
1,762.34
-8.68
-0.49%








Currencies »








Dollar turns lower for the week following GDP report
              
              The U.S. dollar fell on Friday, erasing its gains for the week after a read on economic growth came in below expectations, though analysts said the beleaguered currency was potentially nearing a bottom.              
              
            

3:47 p.m.  Today3:47 p.m. July 28, 2017






Dollar rises from 13-month low
              
              The U.S. dollar rises on Thursday, gaining against major rivals in what analysts suggest a mild consolidation following precipitous declines over recent weeks.               
              
            

2:41 p.m. July 27, 2017












USDJPY



							7/28/2017 4:59pm
					



Japanese Yen


/quotes/zigman/16008150/realtime/sampled

110.688


-0.5710
-0.5132%













One U.S. Dollar Buys ›


British Pound /quotes/zigman/16008140/realtime/sampled
1.3136
+0.0070
+0.5357%


Brazilian Real /quotes/zigman/15936989/realtime/sampled
3.1321
-0.0183
-0.5809%








Commodities »










Commodities  ›


Brent Crude /quotes/zigman/18185161/delayed
52.63
+1.14
+2.21%


Heating Oil /quotes/zigman/25024089/delayed
1.64
+0.04
+2.28%


Natural Gas /quotes/zigman/2306589/delayed
2.92
-0.04
-1.48%


Gold /quotes/zigman/7730417/delayed
1,275.60
+9.10
+0.72%


Silver /quotes/zigman/60158948/delayed
16.75
+0.17
+1.04%


Platinum /quotes/zigman/74312941/delayed
938.00
+11.60
+1.25%


Corn /quotes/zigman/25518705/delayed
389.25
+1.50
+0.39%

















Most Popular





1.





Market Extra

Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials






2.






All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart






3.





Market Snapshot

S&P 500, Nasdaq finish lower after Amazon disappointment; Dow closes at record






4.





MarketWatch First Take

Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’






5.





SectorWatch

Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale








Stock Screener »


Find your top stocks

		Identify stocks based on criteria that you select, such as price 
		movement, volume, fundamentals, technical behavior and industry. 








/conga/tools/stock-screener.html
2585








Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 






Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




10:12 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15























































		     Europe Volatility - VelocityShares - VelocityShares	




















 


contact us
site map
terms of use
privacy policy
home






Search




PRODUCTS

Volatility Strategy
US Volatility
Europe Volatility
Metals
Energy


ABOUT US

Our Team
Careers
Newsroom


RESOURCES

Monthly Reports
White Papers
Index Methodologies
Fact Sheets
General FAQs
Commodities FAQs
Volatility Strategy FAQs
US Volatility FAQs
Europe Volatility FAQs
Prospectus


AFFILIATED WEBSITES

JanusETFs
JanusIndices








PRODUCT DIRECTORY
Asset


Volatility-Strategy

    
(BSWN) VelocityShares VIX Tail Risk ETN
(LSVX) VelocityShares VIX Variable Long/Short ETN 
(XIVH) VelocitySharesVIX Short Volatility Hedged ETN


US-Volatility

    
(TVIX) VelocityShares Daily 2x VIX Short-Term ETN
(VIIX) VelocityShares Daily Long VIX Short-Term ETN
(XIV) VelocityShares Daily Inverse VIX Short-Term ETN
(TVIZ) VelocityShares Daily 2x VIX Medium-Term ETN
(VIIZ) VelocityShares Daily Long VIX Medium-Term ETN
(ZIV) VelocityShares Daily Inverse VIX Medium-Term ETN


Metals

    
(UGLD) VelocityShares 3x Long Gold ETN
(DGLD) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Gold ETN
(USLV) VelocityShares 3x Long Silver ETN
(DSLV) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Silver ETN


Europe-Volatility

    
(EXIV) VelocityShares 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN
(EVIX) VelocityShares 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN


Energy

    
(UWT) VelocityShares 3x Long Crude Oil ETN
(UWTI) VelocityShares 3x Long Crude Oil ETN
(DWT) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Crude Oil ETN
(DWTI) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Crude Oil ETN
(UGAZ) VelocityShares 3x Long Natural Gas ETN
(DGAZ) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Natural Gas ETN




Leverage


1x

    
(VIIX) VelocityShares Daily Long VIX Short-Term ETN
(XIV) VelocityShares Daily Inverse VIX Short-Term ETN
(VIIZ) VelocityShares Daily Long VIX Medium-Term ETN
(ZIV) VelocityShares Daily Inverse VIX Medium-Term ETN
(EVIX) VelocityShares 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN
(EXIV) VelocityShares 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN


2x

    
(TVIX) VelocityShares Daily 2x VIX Short-Term ETN
(TVIZ) VelocityShares Daily 2x VIX Medium-Term ETN


3x

    
(UGLD) VelocityShares 3x Long Gold ETN
(DGLD) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Gold ETN
(USLV) VelocityShares 3x Long Silver ETN
(DSLV) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Silver ETN
(UWT) VelocityShares 3x Long Crude Oil ETN
(UWTI) VelocityShares 3x Long Crude Oil ETN
(DWT) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Crude Oil ETN
(DWTI) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Crude Oil ETN
(UGAZ) VelocityShares 3x Long Natural Gas ETN
(DGAZ) VelocityShares 3x Inverse Natural Gas ETN


Dynamic

    
(BSWN) VelocityShares VIX Tail Risk ETN
(LSVX) VelocityShares VIX Variable Long/Short ETN 
(XIVH) VelocitySharesVIX Short Volatility Hedged ETN




 Sign-up for Alerts

 
 Newsroom








Europe Volatility


VSTOXX® Futures Investable Index
VelocityShares’® suite of two EURO STOXX Volatility ETPs includes 1x long and daily inverse positions on the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Indices.  The VelocityShares VSTOXX-related ETPs are the only US listed ETPs providing exposure to volatility futures on the European stock market. These ETNs provide institutional investors with exchange traded instruments for implementing views on volatility and hedging risks. Investors can employ  strategies using combinations of these ETNs with other US volatility instruments to create volatility selling strategies, as well as tail risk (black swan) strategies, in addition to expressing short term view on European volatility futures.





Leverage


Ticker


Name


Closing
Indicative
Value


ETNs Outstanding


Prospectus





Europe-Volatility



VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index USD™



-1x
EXIV
VelocityShares 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN
33.97
1,000,000
Prospectus



VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index USD™



1x
EVIX
VelocityShares 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN
19.52
1,000,000
Prospectus



Date as of 07/28/2017




Velocity Shares | 19 Old Kings Highway S | Darien, CT 06820 | 877-5 VELOCITY (877-583-5624)




VelocityShares  | 17 Old Kings Highway S | Darien, CT 06820 | 877-5 VELOCITY (877-583-5624) | Contact Us | Site Design: 341 Studios




Trading
Leveraged
Inverse
Short
Ultra Short Silver
Double Silver
Triple Silver
Implied Volatility
Equity Volatility
Silver
Gold
Precious Metals
Energy
Oil
Natural Gas
Nat Gas
Crude Oil
WTI
West Texas Intermediate
Volatility
VIX
S&P 500
ETF
ETN
ETP
Variance Swap
Tail Risk
Black Swan
Futures
Options




 



ETN Risks
Important information about the VelocityShares ETNs is contained within the current prospectuses. For more complete information regarding the VelocityShares ETNs, download a prospectus from this site, call 1-877-5-VELOCITY or 1-203-992-4301, or write to Prospectus Inquiry, VelocityShares, 17 Old Kings Highway S, Darien, CT, 06820 to request a prospectus. You should read the prospectus carefully before making an investment decision.
Not all risks described below will apply to all products.  Please refer to the applicable prospectus supplement for a detailed discussion of risks applicable to a particular ETN.
An investment in the ETNs involves significant risks. Please read the more detailed explanation of risks relating to an investment in the ETNs in “Risk Factors” in the applicable pricing supplement.
The ETNs are intended to be daily trading tools for sophisticated investors to manage daily trading risks.  They are designed to achieve their stated investment objectives on a daily basis, but their performance over different periods of time can differ significantly from their stated daily objectives.  The ETNs are riskier than securities that have intermediate- or long-term investment objectives, and may not be suitable for investors who plan to hold them for a period other than one day.  Any decision to hold the ETNs for more than one day should be made with great care and only as the result of a series of daily (or more frequent) investment decisions to remain invested in the ETNs for the next one-day period.  Accordingly, the ETNs should be purchased only by knowledgeable investors who understand the potential consequences of an investment linked to the underlying index and of seeking daily compounding, leveraged long or leveraged inverse investment results, as applicable.  Investors should actively and frequently monitor their investments in the ETNs, even intra-day.  If an investor holds the ETNs for more than one day, it is possible that the investor will suffer significant losses in the ETNs even if the performance of the underlying index over the time the investor holds them is positive, in the case of the leveraged long ETNs, or negative, in the case of the leveraged inverse ETNs.
Because the ETNs are linked to the daily performance of the applicable underlying index and may include either leveraged long or leveraged inverse exposure, adverse changes in the market price of the futures included in the underlying index will have a magnified adverse effect on the ETNs and a greater likelihood of causing such ETNs to be worth zero than if such ETNs were not linked to the leveraged inverse or leveraged long return of the applicable underlying Index.
The ETNs do not guarantee any return of principal at maturity, acceleration or redemption and do not pay any interest during their term.
Although the issuer intends to list or has listed the ETNs on NYSE Arca, NASDAQ, or BATS, a trading market for your ETNs may not develop.  The issuer is not required to maintain any listing of the ETNs on an exchange.  The issuer of the ETNs may delist the ETNs from any exchange for any reason at any time.
The issuer is not obligated to issue any particular amount of the ETNs and may suspend further issuances at any time.  If the issuer suspends further issuances of the ETNs, it is possible that the ETNs could begin to trade at a premium to the indicative value.  Any premium that develops may be reduced or eliminated at any time, including as a result of an announcement that the issuer will restart issuances or an announcement that the issuer will exercise its right to accelerate the ETNs for an amount based on the indicative value.  Paying a premium purchase price over the indicative value of the ETNs could lead to significant losses in the event the investor sells the ETNs at a time when such premium is no longer present in the marketplace or the ETNs are accelerated at the issuer’s option.
The trading price of the ETNs may vary considerably before any valuation date (as defined in each prospectus), due, among other factors, to fluctuations in the price or the volatility of the underlying index, and other events that are difficult to predict. At higher levels of volatility, and since the ETNs are not principal protected, there is a significant chance of a complete loss of ETN value even if the performance of the underlying index is flat.
The daily resetting of each ETN’s leveraged exposure to the underlying index is likely to cause each ETN to experience a “decay” effect, which is likely to worsen over time and will be greater the more volatile the underlying index.  The “decay” effect refers to a likely tendency of the ETNs to lose value over time independent of the performance of the underlying index.  Accordingly, the ETNs are not suitable for intermediate- or long-term investment, as any intermediate- or long-term investment is very likely to sustain significant losses, even if the underlying index appreciates (in the case of the leveraged long ETNs) or depreciates (in the case of the leveraged inverse ETNs) over the relevant time period.  Although the decay effect is more likely to manifest itself the longer the ETNs are held, the decay effect can have a significant impact on ETN performance even over a period as short as two days.
If the level of the underlying index decreases or does not increase sufficiently (or if it increases or does not decrease sufficiently in the case of inverse ETNs), to offset the effect of the Daily Investor Fee and any other applicable fees over the term of the ETNs, the investor will receive less than the amount invested upon sale, early redemption, acceleration or maturity of the ETNs.
Prior to maturity, you may, subject to certain restrictions described in the pricing supplement, offer the applicable minimum number of your ETNs to the issuer for redemption on an Early Redemption Date (as defined in the prospectus). You must offer for redemption at least the applicable minimum number of ETNs (typically 25’000 or 50’000 depending on the product) as set forth in the pricing supplement, or an integral multiple of such amount in excess thereof, at one time in order to exercise your right to cause the issuer to redeem your ETNs on any Early Redemption Date. In addition, the issuer may charge investors a redemption charge of a percentage of the Closing Indicative Value of any ETN that is redeemed at the investor’s option, at a rate as indicated in the applicable pricing supplement.  Please see the applicable pricing supplement for fees or charges relating to the ETNs.
Any payment on the ETNs is subject to the ability of the issuer to satisfy its obligations as they become due.
The risks listed above are not exhaustive. Investors should review the prospectus for each ETN, including all risk factors set forth therein, and consult their independent tax, accounting, legal and financial advisors before investing in any ETN.
VelocityShares® is a trade name used by Janus Distributors LLC, a registered U.S. broker-dealer, in connection with the services and products described herein.
“VelocityShares” and the VelocityShares logo are trademarks of Janus International Holding LLC. Janus Index and Calculation Services LLC (“Janus Index”)  is the licensor of certain trademarks, service marks and trade names of Janus International Holding LLC and of certain Indices, which are determined, composed and calculated by Janus Index without regard to the issuer of the any securities which may be linked to such indices. Neither Janus, Janus Index nor any other party guarantees the accuracy and/or the completeness of the indices or any date included therein.
Securities Products: Are Not FDIC Insured * Are Not Bank Guaranteed * May Lose Value
This site is for informational purposes only. Nothing herein constitutes a solicitation, offer or recommendation by VelocityShares or its affiliates to buy or sell securities. VelocityShares does not render investment, tax, accounting or legal advice. The securities discussed herein are complex products and may not be suitable for all investors and should only be used by knowledgeable investors who understand the potential consequences of seeking inverse or leveraged investment results. Investors should actively monitor their investments in the securities. Investors should review the prospectus for each security and make their own investment decisions based on their specific investment objectives and financial position and after consulting independent tax, accounting, legal and financial advisors. VelocityShares will receive a fee from the issuers of the products discussed on this site based on the quantity of products outstanding.
Past performance does not predict future performance. The value of the securities may decrease and investors may lose some or all of their investment.
Please see “VelocityShares Terms of Use” for additional information regarding use of this website.
The applicable issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the Securities and Exchange Commission (”SEC”) for the ETNs.  Before you invest, you should read the registration statement (including the prospectus and the documents incorporated by reference into the registration statement) to understand fully the terms of the ETNs and other considerations that are important in making a decision about investing in the ETNs. You may get these documents without cost by visiting EDGAR on the SEC website at www.sec.gov.  Alternatively, you can request these documents without cost by calling toll-free 1-877-5-VELOCITY or 1-203-992-4301.
 
STOXX Limited, Deutsche Börse Group and their licensors, research partners or data providers have no relationship to the Licensee, other than the licensing of the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index® and the related trademarks for use in connection with the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN and VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN, respectively.
STOXX, Deutsche Börse Group and their licensors, research partners or data providers do not: 

»	sponsor, endorse, sell or promote the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN.
»	 recommend that any person invest in the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN, or any other securities.
»	 have any responsibility or liability for or make any decisions about the timing, amount or pricing of VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN.
»	 have any responsibility or liability for the administration, management or marketing of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN.
»	 consider the needs of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN or the owners of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN in determining, composing or calculating the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index® or have any obligation to do so.
STOXX, Deutsche Börse Group and their licensors, research partners or data providers give no warranty, and exclude any liability (whether in negligence or otherwise), in connection with the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN or their performance.
STOXX does not assume any contractual relationship with the purchasers of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN, or any other third parties.
Specifically,

»	STOXX, Deutsche Börse Group and their licensors, research partners or data providers do not give any warranty, express or implied, and exclude any liability about:

-The results to be obtained by the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN, the owner of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN or any other person in connection with the use of the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index®, and the data included in the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index®;

-The accuracy, timeliness, and completeness of the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index® and its data;

-The merchantability and the fitness for a particular purpose or use of the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index® and its data;

-The performance of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN generally.
»	STOXX, Deutsche Börse Group and their licensors, research partners or data providers give no warranty and exclude any liability, for any errors, omissions or interruptions in the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index® or its data;
»	Under no circumstances will STOXX, Deutsche Börse Group or their licensors, research partners or data providers be liable (whether in negligence or otherwise) for any lost profits or indirect, punitive, special or consequential damages or losses, arising as a result of such errors, omissions or interruptions in the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Investable Index® and the VSTOXX Short-Term Futures Inverse Investable Index®, or its data or generally in relation to the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN, even in circumstances where STOXX, Deutsche Börse Group or their licensors, research partners or data providers are aware that such loss or damage may occur. 
The licensing Agreement between the Licensee and STOXX is solely for their benefit and not for the benefit of the owners of the VelocityShares® 1X Long VSTOXX Futures ETN or the VelocityShares® 1X Daily Inverse VSTOXX Futures ETN, or any other third parties.
“Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®”, “S&P 500®”, “Standard & Poor’s 500™”, “S&P 500 VIX Short-Term Futures™”,  “S&P 500 VIX Mid-Term Futures™”, “S&P GSCI®”, “S&P GSCI® Gold Index”,  “S&P GSCI® Silver Index” , “S&P GSCI® Platinum Index”, “S&P GSCI® Palladium Index”,   “S&P GSCI®  Brent Crude Index”, “S&P GSCI® Crude Oil Index”, “S&P GSCI® Natural Gas Index” and “S&P GSCI®  Copper Index”are trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“S&P”) and have been licensed for use by Janus Index & Calculation Services. “VIX” is a trademark of the Chicago Board Options Exchange, Incorporated (“CBOE”) and has been licensed for use by S&P. The ETNs are not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by S&P or CBOE and S&P and CBOE make no representation regarding the advisability of investing in the ETNs. The S&P GSCI index and the S&P GSCI sub-indices are not owned, endorsed, or approved by or associated with Goldman Sachs & Co. or its affiliated companies.
 













